<?xml version='1.0' encoding='UTF-8'?>
<DOC><DOCNO> FR88718-0009 </DOCNO><DOCID>fr.7-18-88.f2.A1008</DOCID><TEXT><ITAG tagnum="94"><ITAG tagnum="69"><ITAG tagnum="50">DEPARTMENT OF THE TREASURY</ITAG><ITAG tagnum="18">Internal Revenue Service</ITAG><ITAG tagnum="52">26 CFR Part 1 </ITAG><ITAG tagnum="41">[T.D. 8214]</ITAG><ITAG tagnum="52">Application of Section 904 to Income Subject to Separate Limitations</ITAG><ITAG tagnum="10"><T2>AGENCY: </T2>Internal Revenue Service, Treasury.</ITAG><ITAG tagnum="10"><T2>ACTION: </T2>Final Regulations. </ITAG><ITAG tagnum="10"><T2>SUMMARY: </T2>This document contains final regulations relating tothe application of section 904 with respect to income received or accruedby a taxpayer consisting of income described in section 904(d). These regulationsare necessary because of the changes made to the applicable law by theTax Reform Act of 1986. The regulations provide the public with guidanceneeded to comply with that act and affect individuals and entities claimingthe foreign tax credit.</ITAG><ITAG tagnum="10"><T2>DATES: </T2>The amendments are generally to be effective for taxableyears beginning after December 31, 1986. Paragraphs (c) (2), (3), (4),and (5) of andSection; 1.904-4 apply to taxable years beginning after December31, 1987.</ITAG><ITAG tagnum="10"><T2>FOR FURTHER INFORMATION CONTACT: </T2>Carolyn M. DuPuy of the Officeof Associate Chief Counsel (International), within the Office of ChiefCounsel, Internal Revenue Service, 1111 Constitution Avenue NW., Washington,DC 20224 (Attention: CC:LR:T) (202-634-5406).</ITAG><ITAG tagnum="10"><T2>SUPPLEMENTARY INFORMATION: </T2><ITAG tagnum="84">Background </ITAG>This document contains amendments to the Income Tax Regulations (26 CFRPart 1) under section 904 of the Internal Revenue Code of 1954. These amendmentsare made to conform the regulations to section 1201 of the Tax Reform Actof 1986 (Pub. L. 99-514) and are issued under the authority contained insections 7805 and 904(d)(5) of the Internal Revenue Code (68A Stat. 637,26 U.S.C. 7805 and 100 Stat. 2524, 26 U.S.C. 904(d)(5)). On August 26, 1987, the <T4>Federal Register </T4>published proposed amendments to the Income TaxRegulations (26 CFR Part 1) under sections 904 of the Internal RevenueCode of 1954 (51 FR 3193). The amendments provide rules for determininga taxpayer's foreign tax credit limitations under section 904(d). The proposedregulations reflected proposed technical corrections. Because the technicalcorrections bill has not yet been passed by the Congress, portions of thefinal regulations have been reserved. In addition, the regulations havebeen reserved on the issue of whether payments from a foreign parent toits United States subsidiary should be characterized under the principlesof the look-through rules. The reserved portions are: Section 1.904-4(c)(6)(iv) increase in taxes paid by successors; Section 1.904-4(e)(1) the definition of financial services income; Section 1.904-4(e)(5) (i) and (ii) exceptions to the definition of financialservices income; Section 1.904-4(g)(2)(iv) the treatment of section 1293 inclusions attributableto section 902 corporations; Section 1.904-4(h)(3)(ii) export financing interest received or accruedby a financial services entity; Section 1.904-4(h)(3)(iii) export financing interest that is high-withholdingtax interest; Section 1.904-4(h)(3)(iv) <T3>Example (2); </T3>Section 1.904-4(h)(3)(v)(C) <T3>Example (2) </T3>and <T3>Example (4); </T3>Section 1.904-4(k) priority rules; Section 1.904-5(c)(1)(ii) <T3>Example (2) </T3>and <T3>Example (3); </T3>Section 1.904-5(d)(1) de minimis amounts of subpart F income; Section 1.904-5(d)(3) <T3>Example (1) </T3>and <T3>Example (2); </T3>Section 1.904-5(h)(3) income from the sale of a partnership interest; Section 1.904-5(i)(3) special rule for payments from foreign parents todomestic subsidiaries; Section 1.904-5(j) look-through rules applied to passive foreign investmentcompanies; Section 1.904-5(1) <T3>Example (2) </T3>and <T3>Example (5); </T3>Section 1.904-5(m)(7) coordination with treaties. Numerous written comments were received with respect to the proposed regulations.A public hearing was held on November 12, 1987. The significant pointsraised by the comments and the changes made to the proposed amendmentsare discussed in the remainder of the preamble. After consideration ofthe comments regarding the proposed amendments, the amendments are adoptedas modified by this Treasury decision. <ITAG tagnum="84">Discussion of Major Comments and Revised Amendments </ITAG>Section 1.904-4 Separate application of section 904 with respect to certaincategories of income. In response to comments, an example has been added to paragraph (b)(1)to make it clear that if a taxpayer has foreign currency gain that wouldnot be foreign personal holding company income if the taxpayer were a controlledforeign corporation because the gain is directly related to the businessneeds of the corporation, that income will not be passive income withinthe meaning of section 904(d)(2)(A)(i). Paragraph (b)(2) has been revised to provide that the determination ofwhether a rent or royalty is an active rent or royalty for purposes ofsection 904(d) shall be made taking into account the activities of allmembers of the recipient's affiliated group (as redefined to include foreigncorporations). This revision changes the rules in the proposed regulationsin several respects. First, the regulations, as revised, now treat rentsand royalties received by a domestic corporation and those received bya controlled foreign corporation in the same way. Second, the regulationsnow provide a rule for qualifying rents received by a controlled foreigncorporation as active rents by reference to the activities of an affiliateof the controlled foreign corporation. Third, the requirement that thecontrolled foreign corporation perform activities that are an essentialeconomic element with respect to the royalties it receives is eliminated.Fourth, the regulations, as revised, provide that a United States shareholderthat receives a rent or royalty directly can satisfy the active conducttest by reference to its own activities or the activities of affiliates(including foreign affiliates) of the shareholder. These changes to theproposed regulations were made in response to numerous comments that theproposed regulations were too restrictive because they did not allow theactivities of foreign affiliates of the recipient to be considered andbecause they required a recipient that was a controlled foreign corporationto perform an activity that was an essential economic element in the realizationof the royalty. The changes were also in response to comments that theproposed regulations did not provide parallel treatment for rent and royaltyincome received by a controlled foreign corporation. Section 1.904-4(c)(1) provides rules for determining whether an item ofincome that is otherwise passive income is high-taxed income and, therefore,should be treated as general limitation income. Numerous comments werereceived suggesting that the rules be simplified. In response to thosecomments the grouping rules have been changed and paragraph (c)(2)(ii)is added to provide that a taxpayer that allocates and apportions interestexpense on an asset basis may further apportion passive interest expenseamong the groups of passive income on a gross income basis. Paragraph (c)(3),as revised, groups items of income received directly by a United Statesperson (other than through a foreign branch) according to the rate of withholdingtax on the items. These rules apply both to income received from unrelatedpersons and income received from controlled foreign corporations. Theserules also apply to subpart F inclusions and items of income earned througha foreign branch to the extent provided in paragraph (c)(4). Under paragraph(c)(4), income is initially grouped into two groups, income from sourceswithin the QBU's country of operation and income from sources outside theQBU's country of operation. Income from outside the country of operationis then grouped according to the rate of withholding tax. These rules areapplied separately for each foreign QBU. Paragraph (c)(5) provides specialrules for grouping certain enumerated items of income. The grouping rulesare effective for taxable years beginning after December 31, 1987. SeeNotice 87-6, 1987-3 I.R.B. 8, for the grouping ru1es for taxab1e yearsbeginning after December 31, 1986 and before January 1, 1988.Paragraph (c)(6) provides rules relating to the determination of whetheran amount included in gross income under section 951(a) is high-taxed incomeif additional taxes are paid or deemed paid in the year of receipt of thisincome. Several commenters suggested that we should permit taxpayers toelect, on a distribution by distribution basis, whether to go back andamend their returns to reflect the increase in tax. It was also suggestedthat the exception for distributions received during the prefiling periodbe changed to expand the prefiling period. The final regulations do notallow such an election but do redefine the prefiling period to be a periodending 90 days prior to the due date of the return (determined with extensions)for the taxable year of inclusion. The preamble to the proposed regulations asked for comments concerningwhether the rules in paragraph (c) should apply to gains and losses resultingfrom a change in the effective rate of tax because of exchange rate fluctuationsbetween the time an amount is included in the gross income of a UnitedStates shareholder of a controlled foreign corporation under section 951and the distribution to the United States shareholder of earnings attributableto that amount. Several commenters stated that there should be no recharacterizationof the initial inclusion because of exchange rate fluctuations betweenthe time of the inclusion and the time of the distribution of that income.The final regulations do not require such a recharacterization becausethe foreign currency gain or loss is attributable to an increase or decreasein the value of the controlled foreign corporation's earnings and profitsand not to an increase or decrease in the amount of income earned by thecontrolled foreign corporation in the inclusion year. Paragraph (c)(7) provides special rules for determining whether incomethat has been taxed under an integrated tax system is high-taxed income.In the preamble to the proposed regulations taxpayers were invited to commenton the application of this rule to cases in which the foreign tax systemdoes not provide a mechanism for tracing distributions out of a particularyear's earnings. One commenter suggested that the regulations adopt a FIFOrule for tracing distributions. The final regulations provide that, ingeneral, the rules of andSection; 1.904-6 apply for purposes of determiningto which category the reduction in taxes on distribution relate. However,the reduction in taxes shall be attributable on a last-in first-out (LIFO)basis to foreign taxes potentially subject to reduction that are associatedwith previously taxed income, on a LIFO basis to foreign taxes associatedwith income that remains as passive income under paragraph (c)(7)(iii),and then on a LIFO basis to foreign taxes associated with other earningsand profits. The final regulations also clarify that the rules in paragraphs(6) and (7) relating to increases and decreases in foreign tax rate ondistributions out of PTI apply only to net increases or decreases in foreigntax liability. Thus, if on distribution the foreign corporate tax is reducedbut the reduction is fully offset by a withholding tax on the distribution,no reduction will be considered to have occurred for purposes of determiningwhether the income is high-taxed. Paragraph (e)(1) concerning the definition of financial services incomehas been reserved because of the pending technical corrections bill thatlimits the financial services category to entities that are predominantlyengaged in the active conduct of a banking, insurance, financing or similarbusiness (active financing business). Paragraph (e) (2), (3), and (e)(4)have not been reserved because the definition of active financing income,the determination of when an entity is predominantly engaged in the activefinancing business and the definition of incidental income are relevantunder current law and under the technical corrections bill. Paragraphs(e)(5) (i) and (ii) have been reserved because of the proposed technicalcorrection concerning the exceptions from financial services income forincome that is export financing interest and high withholding tax interest.Numerous comments were received with respect to what constitutes incomefrom the active conduct of a banking, insurance, financing or similar business(active financing income). Paragraph (e)(2) reflects some of the suggestionsfor additions to the list of includible income. The list has been changedto include related person insurance income. Paragraph (e)(2) has also beenchanged to allow taxpayers to include items of income similar to thoseenumerated if such items are disclosed in a manner designated in the instructionsto the Forms 1116 and 1118 or in guidance published by the Internal RevenueService. For any year in which the instructions to the Forms 1118 and 1116do not provide a method of designating similar items, a taxpayer may includesimilar items as active financing income even though they are not designated.This change is made in recognition of the fact that financial institutionsconstantly market new products, income from which may appropriately becategorized as active financing income. Several commenters suggested that the requirement that an entity earn eightypercent of its gross income from active financing income should be liberalized.The eighty percent test in paragraph (e)(3)(i) has been maintained.</ITAG><ITAG tagnum="10">The Conference Report to the 1986 Act makes it clear that an entityshall not be considered predominantly engaged in the active conduct ofa financial services business unless a ``high percentage'' of the entity'sincome is active financing income. In addition, the eighty percent testseems reasonable in light of two other changes to the proposed regulations.The first of these changes is the addition of similar items of income tothe list of active financing income. The second change is a revision ofparagraph (e)(3)(i) to exclude from the eighty percent computation anygain from the sale of stock of a corporation controlled by the transferor.This latter change was made to prevent an entity from disqualifying itselffrom financial services status because of a large one-time gain from thesale of stock. In addition, the application of the eighty percent testhas been changed to eliminate from the test any income characterized underthe look-through rules that is received from a related person that is afinancial services entity. Income received from a related person that isnot a financial services entity but that is financial services income underthe look-through rules is also eliminated. In response to comments, paragraph (e)(3)(i) has been changed to requireforeign affiliates to be considered when applying the eighty percent teston an affiliated basis. In addition, that paragraph has been changed tomake it clear that certain income from intercompany transactions is notconsidered in applying the affiliated group test, that leasing income willnot be considered to be active financing income for purposes of the affiliatedgroup test if any member of the group meets the requirements of section954 (c)(2)(A), and that passive income will not be considered active financingincome for purposes of the affiliated group test merely because that incomeis earned by a member of the group that is a financial services entityunder the entity level test. Paragraph (e)(3)(iii) provides rules for applying the eighty percent testto partnerships. That paragraph has been changed to conform with changesto the general rule in paragraph (e)(3)(i). Paragraph (e)(4) describes incidental income that will be considered tobe financial services income if earned by a financial services entity.Several commenters stated that the rule regarding debt-equity conversionswas too restrictive. That rule has been change to establish that incomereceived within the first five years of the conversion is incidental income.Section 1.904-4(g)(1) defines the term ``noncontrolled section 902 corporation.''That paragraph has been changed to make it clear that, in general, a controlledforeign corporation is not a section 902 corporation with respect to distributionsout of earnings and profits earned during periods when the corporationis a controlled foreign corporation. Paragraph (g)(2)(iv) concerning the treatment of inclusions under section1293 has been reserved. Paragraph (g)(3) has been changed to provide that dividends from a CFCattributable to a period when the CFC was neither a CFC nor a noncontrolledsection 902 corporation will be treated as dividends from a noncontrolledsection 902 corporation. This change has been made because it is consistentwith the statute. Two commenters suggested that dividends from earningsattributable to periods when the CFC was neither a CFC or a noncontrolledsection 902 corporation should be characterized under look-through principles.It was determined that there was no statutory basis for such treatment.Sections 1.904-4(h)(3) (ii) and (iii) relating to export financing interestthat is received or accrued by a financial service entity and export financinginterest that is high-withholding tax interest have been reserved. Section 1.904-4(j) contains a special rule relating to the treatment ofcertain currency gain or loss. Section 1.904-4(k) relating to the priority rules has been reserved. Section 1.904-5 Look-through rules as applied to controlled foreign corporationsand other entities. Section 1.904-5 provides look-through rules for CFCs and other entities.paragraph (a)(1) defines the term ``separate category'' of income. Paragraph(a)(2) defines the term ``controlled foreign corporation.'' Paragraph (a)(3)defines the term ``United States shareholder.'' This paragraph has beenchanged to include affiliates in the definition of a ``United States shareholder.''Section 1.904-5(c)(2)(i) provides that interest that is received or accruedfrom a CFC in which the taxpayer is a United States shareholder shall betreated as income in a separate category to the extent it is allocableto income of the CFC in that category. Paragraph (c)(2)(ii) provides rulesfor allocating expenses of a CFC to the income of the CFC in separate categoriesif interest is paid to a United States shareholder of the CFC (relatedperson interest). Pursuant to section 954(b)(5), this paragraph providesthat related person interest is allocated to passive income of the CFCto the extent of such passive income (the ``netting rule''). Two commenters suggested that unrelated person interest should be allocatedto passive income before related person interest. One commenter suggestedthat the netting rule should be applied to financial services income. Thesechanges were not adopted because they lack statutory support. The final regulations do, however, change paragraph (c)(2) in some importantrespects. Under the final regulations, non-interest expenses that are notdefinitely related, or that are definitely related to all classes of income,are allocated to the separate categories after the allocation of relatedperson interest. This change was made to avoid the creation of passivelosses and because it seemed more consistent with the theory underlyingthe netting rule that passive investments of a controlled foreign corporationthat are funded by related person debt should be treated as if they weredirect investments of the related person. In addition, the final regulationshave been changed to combine into one step the allocation of these non-definitelyrelated expenses and non-definitely related third person interest. Thischange is a simplifying change and is consistent with the theory of thenetting rule. The final regulations also provide rules for allocating expenseswhen the CFC allocates interest expense on a gross income basis. This rulereflects the anticipated adoption of this alternative in andSection; 1.861-8.Paragraph (c)(4)(i) provides that dividends shall be treated as incomein a separate category in proportion to the ratio of the portion of earningsand profits attributable to income in such category to the total amountof earnings and profits of the CFC. This rule has been changed to makeit clear that it applies to an amount included in gross income under section951(a)(1)(B). Paragraph (c)(4)(ii) provides a special rule for dividendsattributable to loans made to the CFC payor by a related person. In responseto several comments, this rule has been changed to clarify the situationsin which it will apply. Section 1.904-5(d) concerning the de minimis rule for subpart F incomehas been reserved pending the passage of the technical corrections bill.Several commenters suggested that de minimis rules should be adopted inother contexts, <T3>e.g. </T3>for partnership income or for income earned directly by aUnited States person. These changes were not adopted because they lackstatutory support. Section 1.904-5(g) provides for the application of the look-through rulesto certain foreign source payments between related United States corporations.The final regulations expand the types of entities to which the look-throughrules apply. Section 1.904-5(h)(1) provides rules for the application of the look-throughrules to partnerships. Paragraph (h)(2) provides an exception to the look-throughrules for certain less than 10 percent general and limited partnershipinterests. Several commenters suggested that the exception should be deleted.The final regulations retain the exception, because it is felt that theseinterests are properly characterized as passive investments. In response to comments, paragraph (h)(4) has been added to provide rulesfor valuing a partnership interest. Section 1.904-5(i) provides rules for the application of the look-throughrules to related CFCs. Several commenters suggested that the definitionof a related CFC be expanded to include all situations in which there is10 percent common ownership of the CFCs or in which the CFC owns at least10 percent of other CFCs. This change was not adopted because it was feltthat it would allow significant dilution of the ownership requirementswhen income is paid through tiers. In response to comments, these ruleshave been expanded to provide rules for determining when entities otherthan CFCs are related. Section 1.904-5(j) concerning the application of the look-through rulesto passive foreign investment company inclusions has been reserved. Section 1.904-5(k) provides ordering rules for purposes of determiningthe character of income received or accrued by a person from a relatedperson if the payor or another related person also receives or accruesincome from the recipient and the look-through rules apply to the incomein all cases. These rules have been clarified to deal with partnershipdistributions and offsetting interest payments when more than two relatedpersons are involved. Section 1.904-5(l) provides rules for the application of section 904(g)to income of a CFC. The application of section 904(g) to income of UnitedStates-owned foreign corporations other than CFCs is not addressed in theserules. Paragraph (l)(2) has been changed to reflect the changes to thetreatment of related person interest. Section 1.904-5(n) provides rules for the order of application of sections904 (d) and (g). This rule does not address how principles similar to thoseof section 904(f) apply to income earned at the CFC level because the Serviceis still considering this issue. See Notice 88-71, 1988-27 I.R.B. 17, forthe effect of deficits in one separate category on earnings and profitsin other categories. Section 1.904-6 Allocation of taxes. Section 1.904-6 provides rules for the allocation of taxes to a separatecategory of income. Paragraph (a)(1) provides the general rule for allocatingtaxes to separate categories of income. This rule has been changed to makeit clear that the principles of section 954(b)(5) apply for purposes ofdetermining the net amount of income in a separate category. In responseto comments, paragraph (a)(1)(iii) has been added to provide rules forapportioning taxes to groups of passive income for purposes of the high-taxkickout. One commenter suggested that foreign taxes should be allocatedon a multi-year basis. This suggestion was not adopted. Paragraph (a)(2)provides a special rule for the treatment of foreign taxes allocable tocertain dividends from noncontrolled section 902 corporations. An examplehas been added that clarifies the application of this paragraph.Section 1.904-6(b)(1) provides rules for the determination of foreign taxesdeemed paid under sections 902 and 960 for taxes allocated to differentcategories of income. The proposed regulations provided a special allocationrule for taxes on income excluded from subpart F under section 954(b)(4).In response to comments, this rule has been eliminated. Section 1.904-7 Transition rules. Section 1.904-7 provides transition rules for the application of section904(d). The heading of paragraph (a)(1) has been modified to refer to controlledforeign corporations because some taxpayers were incorrectly reading thisparagraph as applying to distributions from noncontrolled corporationsout of pre-effective date earnings. Under the rules of andSection; 1.904-4(g)(1),distributions from a noncontrolled section 902 corporation are treatedas distributions from a noncontrolled section 902 corporation even if outof pre-effective date earnings and profits. Paragraph (e) provides a rule for the characterization of amounts subjectto recapture under section 585(c). This rule has been changed to providethat the recapture income can be treated as attributable to high-withholdingtax interest if the taxpayer establishes to the satisfaction of the Secretarythat the recapture amount is attributable to high-withholding tax interest.In determining whether recapture income is attributable to high-withholdingtax interest or financial services income, the transition rule of section1201(e)(2) of the Tax Reform Act of 1986 will be taken into account tothe extent this rule is applicable in the recapture year. Section 701 of the Act (relating to the limitation on the use of foreigntax credits against minimum tax liability) shall apply notwithstandingany treaty provisions in effect on the date of enactment of the Act. <ITAG tagnum="84">Special Analyses </ITAG>It has been determined that this rule is not a major rule as defined inExecutive Order 12291 and that a Regulatory Impact Analysis is thereforenot required. The Internal Revenue Service has also concluded that regulationsproposed herein are interpretative and that the notice and public procedurerequirements of 5 U.S.C. 553 do not apply. Accordingly, these regulationsdo not constitute regulations subject to the Regulatory Flexibility Act(5 U.S.C. chapter 6). <ITAG tagnum="84">Drafting Information </ITAG>The principal author of this regulation is Carolyn M. DuPuy of the Officeof Associate Chief Counsel (International), within the Office of ChiefCounsel, Internal Revenue Service. However, other personnel from officesof the Internal Revenue Service and Treasury Department participated indeveloping the regulations on matters of substance and style. <ITAG tagnum="84">List of Subjects in 26 CFR 1.861-1 Through 1.997-1 </ITAG>Income taxes, Aliens, Exports, DISC, Foreign investments in U.S., Foreigntax credit, FSC, Sources of income, United States investments abroad. <ITAG tagnum="84">Adoption of Amendments to the Regulations </ITAG>Accordingly, 26 CFR Part 1 is amended as follows: <ITAG tagnum="84">Income Tax Regulations</ITAG><ITAG tagnum="52">PART 1_[AMENDED] </ITAG><T4>Paragraph 1. </T4>The authority for Part 1 continues to read in part:<ITAG tagnum="21"><T4>Authority: </T4>26 U.S.C. 7805. * * * Sections 1.904-4 through 1.904-7also issued under 26 U.S.C. 904(d)(5). * * *</ITAG><T4>Par. 2. </T4>Sections 1.904-4 and 1.904-5 are removed. New andSection;1.904-0 is added immediately before andSection; 1.904-1. New andSection; 1.904-4through andSection; 1.904-7 are added immediately after andSection; 1.904-3.The added sections read as follows: <ITAG tagnum="80">andSection; 1.904-0</ITAG><ITAG tagnum="89"> Outline of regulation provisions for section 904. </ITAG>(I) Reserved. (II) Reserved. (III) Reserved. (IV) <T3>andSection; 1.904-4 Separate application of section 904 with respectto certain categories of income. </T3>(a) In general. (b) Passive income. (1) In general. (i) Rule. (ii) Example. (2) Active rents or royalties. (i) In general. (ii) Exception for certain rents and royalties. (iii) Unrelated person. (iv) Example. (c) High-Taxed Income. (1) In general. (2) Grouping of items of income in order to determine whether passive incomeis high-taxed income. (i) Effective date. (ii) Allocation and apportionment of expenses. (3) Amounts received or accrued by United States persons. (4) Income of controlled foreign corporations and foreign branches. (i) Income from sources within the QBU's country of operation. (ii) Income from sources without the QBU's country of operation. (iii) Determination of the source of income. (5) Special rules. (i) Certain rents and royalties. (ii) Treatment of partnership income. (iii) Currency gain or loss on distributions out of previously taxed income.(6) Application of this paragraph to additional taxes paid or deemed paidin the year of receipt of previously taxed income. (i) Determination made in year of inclusion. (ii) Exceptions. (iii) Allocation of foreign taxes imposed on distributions of previouslytaxed income. (iv) Increase in taxes paid by successors. (7) Application of this paragraph to certain reductions of tax on distributionsof income. (i) In general. (ii) Allocation of reductions of foreign tax.(iii) Interaction with section 954(b)(4). (8) Redeterminations of foreign tax. (9) Examples. (d) High withholding tax interest. (e) Financial services income. (1) In general. (2) Active financing income. (i) Income included. (3) Financial services entities. (i) In general. (ii) Special rule for affiliated groups. (iii) Treatment of partnerships and other pass-through entities. (A) Rule. (B) Examples. (4) Definition of incidental income. (i) In general. (A) Rule. (B) Examples. (ii) Income that is not incidental income. (5) Exceptions. (f) Shipping income. (g) Non-controlled section 902 corporations. (1) Definition. (2) Treatment of dividends for each separate non-controlled section 902corporation. (i) In general. (ii) Special rule for dividends received by a controlled foreign corporation.(iii) Special rule for high withholding tax interest. (iv) Treatment of inclusions under section 1293. (3) Special rule for controlled foreign corporations. (4) Examples. (h) Export financing interest. (1) Definitions. (i) Export financing interest. (ii) Fair market value. (iii) Related person. (2) Treatment of export financing interest. (3) Interaction of export financing interest and related person factoringincome. (i) Export financing interest that is also related person factoring income.(ii) Export financing interest that is received and accrued by a financialservices entity. (iii) Export financing interest that is high withholding tax interest.(iv) Examples. (v) Income eligible for section 864(d)(7) exception (same country exception)from related person factoring treatment. (A) Income other than interest. (B) Interest income. (C) Examples. (i) Interaction of section 907(c) and income described in this section.(j) Special rule for certain currency gains and losses. (k) Priority rules. (V) <T3>andSection; 1.904-5 </T3><T3>Look through rules as applied to controlled foreign corporations andother entities. </T3>(a) Definitions. (b) In general. (c) Rules for specific types of inclusions and payments. (1) Subpart F inclusions. (i) Rule. (ii) Examples. (2) Interest. (i) In general. (ii) Allocating expenses including interest paid to a related person. (iii) Definitions. (A) Value of assets and reduction in value of assets and gross income.(B) Related person debt allocated to passive assets. (iv) Examples. (3) Rents and royalties. (4) Dividends. (i) Look-through rule. (ii) Special rule for dividends attributable to certain loans. (iii) Examples. (d) Effect of exclusions from Subpart F income. (1) De minimis amount of Subpart F income. (2) Exception for certain income subject to high foreign tax. (3) Examples. (e) Treatment of Subpart F income in excess of 70 percent of gross income.(1) Rule. (2) Example. (f) Modifications of look-through rules for certain income. (1) High withholding tax interest. (2) Dividends from a non-controlled section 902 corporation. (3) Distributions from a FSC. (4) Example. (g) Application of the look-through rules to certain domestic corporations.(h) Application of the look-through rules to partnerships and other pass-throughentities. (1) General rule. (2) Exception for certain partnership interests. (i) Rule. (ii) Exceptions. (3) Income from the sale of a partnership interest. (4) Value of a partnership interest. (i) Application of look-through rules to related entities. (1) In general. (2) Exception for distributive shares of partnership income. (3) Special rule for payments from foreign parents to domestic subsidiaries.(j) Look-through rules applied to passive foreign investment company industries.(k) Ordering rules. (1) In general. (2) Specific rules. (l) Examples. (m) Application of section 904 (g) (1) In general. (2) Treatment of interest payments. (3) Examples. (4) Treatment of dividend payments. (i) Rule. (ii) Determination of earnings and profits from United States sources.(iii) Example. (5) Treatment of Subpart F inclusions. (i) Rule.(ii) Example. (6) Treatment of section 78 amount. (7) Coordination with treaties. (n) Order of application of sections 904 (d) and (g). (o) Effective date. (VI) <T3>andSection; 1.904-6 Allocation of taxes. </T3>(a) Allocation of taxes to a separate category or categories of income.(1) In general. (i) Taxes related to a separate category of income. (ii) Apportionment of taxes related to more than one separate category.(iii) Apportionment of taxes for purposes of applying the high tax incometest. (2) Treatment of certain dividends from non-controlled section 902 corporations.(b) Application of paragraph (a) to sections 902 and 960. (1) Determination of foreign taxes deemed paid. (2) Distributions received from foreign corporations that are excludedfrom gross income under section 959(b). (3) Application of section 78. (4) Increase in limitation. (c) Examples. (VII) <T3>andSection; 1.904-7 </T3><T3>Transition rules. </T3>(a) Characterization of distributions and section 951(a)(1)(B) inclusionsof earnings of a controlled foreign corporation accumulated in taxableyears beginning before January 1, 1987 during taxable years of both thepayor controlled foreign corporation and the recipient which begin afterDecember 31, 1986. (1) In general. (2) Limitation on establishing the character of earnings and profits. (b) Application of look-through rules to distributions (including deemeddistributors) and payments by an entity to a recipient when one's taxableyear begins before January 1, 1987 and the other's taxable year beginsafter December 31, 1986. (1) In general. (2) Payor of interest, rents, or royalties is subject to the Act and recipientis not subject to the Act. (3) Recipient of interest, rents, or royalties is subject to the Act andpayor is not subject to the Act. (4) Recipient of dividends and subpart F inclusions is subject to the Actand payor is not subject to the Act. (5) Examples. (c) Installment sales. (d) Special effective date for high withholding tax interest earned bypersons with respect to qualified loans described in section 1201(e)(2)of the Act. (e) Treatment of certain recapture income. <ITAG tagnum="80">andSection; 1.904-4</ITAG><ITAG tagnum="89"> Separate application of section 904 with respect to certain categoriesof income. </ITAG>(a) <T3>In general. </T3>A taxpayer is required to compute a separate foreigntax credit limitation for income received or accrued in a taxable yearthat is described in section 904(d)(1)(A) (passive income), (B) (high withholdingtax interest), (C) (financial services income), (D) (shipping income),(E) (dividends from each noncontrolled section 902 corporation), (F) (dividendsfrom a DISC or former DISC), (G) (foreign trade income), (H) (distributionsfrom a FSC or former FSC), or (I) (general limitation income). (b) <T3>Passive income_</T3>(1) <T3>In general_</T3>(i) <T3>Rule. </T3>The term ``passive income'' means any_ (A) Income received or accrued by any person that is of a kind that wouldbe foreign personal holding company income (as defined in section 954(c))if the taxpayer were a controlled foreign corporation, including any amountof gain on the sale or exchange of stock in excess of the amount treatedas a dividend under section 1248; or (B) Amount includible in gross income under section 551 or section 1293.Passive income does not include any income that is also described in section904(d)(1) (B) through (H), any export financing interest (as defined insection 904(d)(2)(G) and paragraph (h) of this section), any high-taxedincome (as defined in section 904(d)(2)(F) and paragraph (c) of this section),or any foreign oil and gas extraction income (as defined in section 907(c)).In determining whether any income is of a kind that would be foreign personalholding company income, the rules of section 864(d)(6) shall apply onlyin the case of income of a controlled foreign corporation (as defined insection 957). (ii) <T3>Example. </T3>The following example illustrates the application ofparagraph (b)(1)(i) of this section:<ITAG tagnum="21">P is a domestic corporation with a branch in foreign country X. Pdoes not have any financial services income. For 1988, P has a net foreigncurrency gain that would not constitute foreign personal holding companyincome if P were a controlled foreign corporation because the gain is directlyrelated to the business needs of P. The currency gain is, therefore, generallimitation income to P because it is not income of a kind that would beforeign personal holding company income.</ITAG>(2) <T3>Active rents or royalties_</T3>(i) <T3>In general. </T3>Passive income does not include any rents or royaltiesthat are derived in the active conduct of a trade or business and receivedfrom a person who is an unrelated person. Except as provided in paragraph(b)(2)(ii) of this section, the principles of andSection; 1.954-2(d)(1) shallapply in determining whether rents or royalties are derived in the activeconduct of a trade or business. For this purpose, the term ``taxpayer''shall be substituted for the term ``controlled foreign corporation'' ifthe recipient of the rents or royalties is not a controlled foreign corporation.(ii) <T3>Exception for certain rents and royalties. </T3>Rents or royaltiesare considered derived in the active conduct of a trade or business bya United States person or by a controlled foreign corporation (or otherentity to which the look-through rules apply) for purposes of section 904(but not for purposes of section 954) if the requirements of section 954(c)(2)(A)are satisfied by one or more corporations that are members of an affiliatedgroup of corporations (within the meaning of section 1504(a) without regardto section 1504(b)(3)) of which the recipient is a member. (iii) <T3>Unrelated person. </T3>For purposes of this paragraph (b)(2), a personis considered to be an unrelated person if the person is not a relatedperson within the meaning of section 954(d)(3), without regard to whetherthe relationship described in section 954(d)(3) is between a controlledforeign corporation and another person or between two persons neither oneof which is a controlled foreign corporation. (iv) <T3>Example. </T3>The following example illustrates the application ofparagraph (b)(2)(ii) of this section.<ITAG tagnum="21"><T3>Example. </T3>Controlled foreign corporation S is a wholly-owned subsidiaryof P, a domestic corporation. S is regularly engaged in the restaurantfranchise business. P licenses trademarks, tradenames, certain know-how,related services, and certain restaurant designs for which S pays P anarm's length royalty. P is regularly engaged in the development and licensingof such property. The royalties received by P for the use of its propertyare allocable under the look-through rules of andSection; 1.904-5 to theroyalties S receives from the franchisees. All of the franchisees are unrelatedto S or P and operate in S's country of incorporation. S does not satisfy,but P does satisfy, the active trade or business requirements of andSection;1.954-2(d)(1). The royalty income earned by S with regard to its franchiseesis foreign personal holding company income that is general limitation income,and the royalties paid to P are general limitation income to P.</ITAG>(c) <T3>High-taxed income_</T3>(1) <T3>In general. </T3>Income received or accrued by a United States personthat would otherwise be passive income shall not be treated as passiveincome if the income is determined to be high-taxed income. Income shallbe considered to be high-taxed income if, after allocating expenses ofthe United States person to that income, the sum of the foreign incometaxes paid or accrued by the United States person with respect to suchincome and the foreign taxes deemed paid or accrued by the United Statesperson with respect to such income under section 902 or section 960 exceedsthe highest rate of tax specified in section 1 or section 11, whicheverapplies (and with reference to section 15 if applicable), multiplied bythe amount of such income (including the amount treated as a dividend undersection 78). If, after application of this paragraph, income that wouldotherwise be passive income is determined to be high-taxed income, it shallbe treated as general limitation income, and any taxes imposed on thatincome shall be considered related to general limitation income under andSection;1.904-6. Income and taxes shall be translated at the appropriate rates,as determined under sections 986 and 989 and the regulations thereunder,before application of this paragraph. (2) <T3>Grouping of items of income in order to determine whether passive incomeis high-taxed income_</T3>(i) <T3>Effective Date. </T3>For purposes of determining whether passive incomeis high-taxed income, the grouping rules of paragraphs (c)(3), (c)(4),and (c)(5) of this section apply to taxable years beginning after December31, 1987. See notice 87-6 for the grouping rules applicable to taxableyears beginning after December 31, 1986 and before January 1, 1988. (ii) <T3>Allocation and apportionment of expenses. </T3>For purposes of determiningwhether passive income is high-taxed, expenses shall be allocated and apportionedto each of the groups of passive income (described in paragraphs (c)(3),(c)(4), and (c)(5) of this section) under the rules of andSection; 1.861-8.Taxpayers that allocate and apportion interest expense on an asset basismay nevertheless apportion passive interest expense among the groups ofpassive income on a gross income basis. (3) <T3>Amounts received or accrued by United States persons. </T3>Except asprovided in paragraph (c)(5) of this section, all passive inoome receivedby a United States person shall be subject to the rules of this paragraph(c)(3). However, subpart F inclusions that are passive income and incomethat is earned by a United States person through a foreign qualified businessunit (foreign QBU) that is passive income shall be subject to the rulesof this paragraph only to the extent provided in paragraph (c)(4)(ii) ofthis section. For purposes of this section, a foreign QBU is a QBU (asdefined in section 989(a)) other than a controlled foreign corporation,that has its principal place of business outside the United States. Theserules shall apply whether the income is received from a controlled foreigncorporation of which the United States person is a United States shareholderor from any other person. For purposes of determining whether passive incomeis high-taxed income, the following rules apply: (i) All passive income received during the taxable year that is subjectto a withholding tax of fifteen percent or greater shall be treated asone item of income.(ii) All passive income received during the taxable year that is subjectto a withholding tax of less than fifteen percent (but greater than zero)shall be treated as one item of income. (iii) All passive income received during the taxable year that is subjectto no withholding tax shall be treated as one item of income. (4) <T3>Income of controlled foreign corporations and foreign branches. </T3>Exceptas provided in paragraph (c)(5) of this section, all amounts included inthe gross income of a United States shareholder under section 951(a)(1)for a particular year that (after application of the look-through rulesof section 904(d)(3) and andSection; 1.904-5) are attributable to passiveincome received or accrued by a controlled foreign corporation and allamounts received or accrued by a United States person through a foreignQBU shall be subject to the rules of this paragraph (c)(4). These rulesshall be applied separately to inclusions with respect to each controlledforeign corporation of which the taxpayer is a United States shareholder.These rules shall also be applied separately to income attributable toeach foreign QBU of a United States person and to each QBU of a controlledforeign corporation or any other entity subject to the look-through rulesof andSection; 1.904-5. (i) <T3>Income from sources within the QBU's country of operation. </T3>Passiveincome from sources within the QBU's country of operation shall be treatedas one item of income. (ii) <T3>Income from sources without the QBU's country of operation. </T3>Passiveincome from sources without the QBU's country of operation shall be groupedon the basis of the withholding tax imposed on that income as providedin paragraph (c)(3) (i) through (iii) of this section. (iii) <T3>Determination of the source of income. </T3>For purposes of this paragraph(c)(4), income will be determined to be from sources within or withoutthe QBU's country of operation under the laws of the foreign country ofthe payor of the income. (5) <T3>Special rules_</T3>(i) <T3>Certain rents and royalties. </T3>All items of rent or royalty incometo which an item of rent or royalty expense is directly allocable shallbe treated as a single item of income and shall not be grouped with otheramounts. (ii) <T3>Treatment of partnership income. </T3>A partner's distributive shareof partnership income that is not subject to the look-through rules andthat is treated as passive income under andSection; 1.904-5(h)(2) shall betreated as a single item of income and shall not be grouped with otheramounts. A distributive share of partnership income that is treated aspassive income under the look-through rules shall be grouped accordingto the rules in paragraph (c)(4) of this section that are applicable tosubpart F inclusions. (iii) <T3>Currency gain or loss on distributions out of previously taxed income.</T3>Any currency gain or loss with respect to a distribution receivedby a United States shareholder of previously taxed earnings and profitsthat is recognized under section 986(c) and that is treated as an itemof passive income shall be treated as an item of passive income that issubject to no withholding tax for purposes of paragraph (c)(3) of thissection, unless the distribution is received by a controlled foreign corporationor a foreign QBU of the United States shareholder. Any currency gain orloss with respect to a distribution of previously taxed earnings and profitsthat is recognized under section 986(c) and that is treated as passiveincome, and that is received by a controlled foreign corporation or a foreignQBU of a United States person shall be treated as an item of passive incomefrom sources within the QBU's country of operation for purposes of paragraph(c)(4) of this section. The preceding sentence shall be applied separatelyfor each foreign QBU of the United States person and for each QBU of acontrolled foreign corporation. (6) <T3>Application of this paragraph to additional taxes paid or deemed paidin the year of receipt of previously taxed income_</T3>(i) <T3>Determination made in year of inclusion. </T3>The determination ofwhether an amount included in gross income under section 951(a) is high-taxedincome shall be made in the taxable year the income is included in thegross income of the United States shareholder under section 951(a) (hereinafterthe ``taxable year of inclusion''). Any increase in foreign taxes paidor accrued, or deemed paid or accrued, when the taxpayer receives an amountthat is excluded from gross income under section 959(a) and that is attributableto a controlled foreign corporation's earnings and profits relating tothe amount previously included in gross income will not be considered indetermining whether the amount included in income in the taxable year ofinclusion is high-taxed income.(ii) <T3>Exceptions. </T3>Paragraph (c)(6)(i) of this section shall not applyto an increase in tax in a case in which the taxpayer is required to adjustits foreign taxes in the year of inclusion under section 905(c). Paragraph(c)(6)(i) of this section shall also not apply to the extent that the taxpayerreceives a distribution of earnings and profits that is excluded from grossincome under section 959(a), the distribution is received prior to theday that the taxpayer files its return for the taxable year of inclusionof the amount to which the distribution is attributable, and the distributionis received in the ``prefiling period.'' For this purpose the ``prefilingperiod'' is the period ending 90 days prior to the due date of the return(determined with extensions) for the taxable year of inclusion. In sucha case, for purposes of determining whether the amount included in incomein the taxable year of inclusion is high-taxed income, the United Statesshareholder shall consider as taxes attributable to that inclusion allforeign taxes paid or accrued, or deemed paid or accrued, prior to theend of the prefiling period with respect to that inclusion. A United Statesshareholder may also elect to consider as taxes paid or accrued, or deemedpaid or accrued, with respect to the inclusion all foreign taxes paid oraccrued or deemed paid or accrued after the end of the prefiling periodbut before the taxpayer files its return for the year of inclusion. (iii) <T3>Allocation of foreign taxes imposed on distributions of previouslytaxed income. </T3>If an item of income is considered high-taxed incomein the year of inclusion and paragraph (c)(6)(i) of this section applies,then any increase in foreign income taxes imposed with respect to thatitem shall be considered to be related to general limitation income. Ifan item of income is not considered to be high-taxed income in the taxableyear of inclusion and paragraph (c)(6)(i) of this section applies, thefollowing rules shall apply. The taxpayer shall treat an increase in taxespaid or accrued, or deemed paid or accrued, on any distribution of theearnings and profits attributable to the amount included in gross incomein the taxable year of inclusion as taxes related to passive income tothe extent of the excess of the product of (A) the highest rate of taxin section 11 (determined with regard to section 15 and determined as ofthe year of inclusion) and (B) the amount of the inclusion (after allocationof parent expenses) over (C) the taxes paid or accrued, or deemed paidor accrued, in the year of inclusion. The taxpayer shall treat any taxespaid or accrued, or deemed paid or accrued, on the distribution in excessof this amount as taxes related to general limitation income. If theseadditional taxes are not creditable in the year of distribution the carryoverrules of section 904(c) apply. For purposes of this paragraph, the foreigntax on a subpart F inclusion shall be considered increased on distributionof the earnings and profits associated with that inclusion if the totalof taxes paid and deemed paid on the inclusion and the distribution (takinginto account any reductions in tax and any withholding taxes) is greaterthan the total taxes deemed paid in the year of inclusion. Any foreigncurrency loss associated with the earnings and profits that are distributedwith respect to the inclusion is not to be considered as giving rise toan increase in tax. (iv) <T3>Increase in taxes paid by successors. </T3>[Reserved] (7) <T3>Application of this paragraph to certain reductions of tax on distributionsof income_</T3>(i) <T3>In general. </T3>If the effective rate of tax imposed by a foreigncountry on income of a foreign corporation that is included in a taxpayer'sgross income is reduced under foreign law on distribution of such income,the rules of this paragraph (c) apply at the time that the income is includedin the taxpayer's gross income without regard to the possibility of subsequentreduction of foreign tax on the distribution. If the inclusion is consideredto be high-taxed income, then the taxpayer shall treat the inclusion asgeneral limitation income. When the foreign corporation distributes theearnings and profits to which the inclusion was attributable and the foreigntax on the inclusion is reduced, then the taxpayer shall redetermine whetherthe inclusion should be considered to be high-taxed income provided thata redetermination of United States tax liability is required under section905(c). If, taking into account the reduction in foreign tax, the inclusionwould not have been considered high-taxed income, then the taxpayer, inredetermining its United States tax liability for the year or years affected,shall treat the inclusion and the associated taxes (as reduced on the distribution)as passive income and taxes. See section 905(c) and the regulations thereunderregarding the method of adjustment. For this purpose, the foreign tax ona subpart F inclusion shall be considered reduced on distribution of theearnings and profits associated with the inclusion if the total of taxespaid and deemed paid on the inclusion and the distribution (taking intoaccount any reductions in tax and any withholding taxes) is less that thetotal taxes deemed paid in the year of inclusion. Any foreign currencygain associated with the earnings and profits that are distributed withrespect to the inclusion is not to be considered a reduction of tax.(ii) <T3>Allocation of reductions of foreign tax. </T3>For purposes of paragraph(c)(7)(i) of this section, reductions in foreign tax shall be allocatedamong the separate categories under the same principles as those of andSection;1.904-6 for allocating taxes among the separate categories. For purposesof determining to which year's taxes the reduction in taxes relate, thereduction in taxes shall be attributable, on an annual last in-first out(LIFO) basis, to foreign taxes potentially subject to reduction that areassociated with previously taxed income, then on a LIFO basis to foreigntaxes associated with income that under paragraph (c)(7)(iii) of this sectionremains as passive income but that was excluded from subpart F income undersection 954(b)(4), and finally on a LIFO basis to foreign taxes associatedwith other earnings and profits. Furthermore, in applying the orderingrules of section 959(c), distributions shall be considered made on a LIFObasis first out of earnings described in section 959(c) (1) and (2), thenon a LIFO basis out of earnings and profits associated with income thatremains passive income under paragraph (c)(7)(iii) of this section butthat was excluded from subpart F under section 954(b)(4), and finally ona LIFO basis out of other earnings and profits. (iii) <T3>Interaction with section 954(b)(4). </T3>If the effective rate of taximposed by a foreign country on income of a foreign corporation is reducedunder foreign law on distribution of that income, the rules of section954(b)(4) shall be applied without regard to the possibility of subsequentreduction of foreign tax. If a taxpayer excludes passive income from acontrolled foreign corporation's foreign personal holding company incomeunder these circumstances, then the income shall be considered to be passiveincome until distribution of that income. At that time, the rules of thisparagraph shall apply to determine whether the income is high-taxed incomeand, therefore, general limitation income. For purposes of determiningwhether a reduction in tax is attributable to taxes on income excludedunder section 954(b)(4), the rules of paragraph (c)(7)(ii) of this sectionapply. The rules of paragraph (c)(7)(ii) of this section shall apply forpurposes of ordering distributions to determine whether such distributionsare out of earnings and profits associated with such excluded income. (8) <T3>Redeterminations of foreign tax. </T3>If in the prefiling period thereis a redetermination of foreign taxes, within the meaning of section 905(c)and the regulations thereunder, then, for purposes of this paragraph (c),the amount of foreign taxes paid or deemed paid for the taxable year willbe the taxes as redetermined. (9) <T3>Examples. </T3>The following examples illustrate the application ofthis paragraph (c).<ITAG tagnum="21"><T3>Example (1). </T3>Controlled foreign corporation S is a wholly-ownedsubsidiary of domestic corporation P. S is a single qualified businessunit (QBU) operating in foreign country X. In 1988, S earns $130 of grosspassive royalty income from country X sources, and incurs $30 of expensesthat do not include any payments to P. S's $100 of net passive royaltyincome is subject to $30 of foreign tax, and is included under section951 in P's gross income for the taxable year. P allocates $50 of expensesto the $100 (consisting of the $70 section 951 inclusion and $30 section78 amount), resulting in a net inclusion of $50. After application of thehigh-tax kick-out rules of paragraph (c)(1) of this section, the $50 inclusionis treated as general limitation income, and the $30 of taxes deemed paidare treated as taxes imposed on general limitation income, because theforeign taxes paid and deemed paid on the income exceed the highest UnitedStates tax rate multiplied by the $50 inclusion ($30andgreater;$17 (.34andmultiply;$50)).</ITAG><ITAG tagnum="21"><T3>Example (2). </T3>The facts are the same as in <T3>Example </T3>(1) except that instead of earning $130 of gross passiveroyalty income, S earns $65 of gross passive royalty income from countryX sources and $65 of gross passive interest income from country Y sources.S incurs $15 of expenses and $5 of foreign tax with regard to the royaltyincome and incurs $15 of expenses and $10 of foreign tax with regard tothe interest income. P allocates $50 of expenses pro rata to the $50 inclusion($45 section 951 inclusion and $5 section 78 amount) attributable to theroyalty income earned by S and the $50 inclusion ($40 section 951 inclusionand $10 section 78 amount) attributable to the interest income earned byS. Under paragraph (c)(4) of this section, the high-tax test is appliedseparately to the section 951 inclusion attributable to the income fromX sources and the section 951 inclusion attributable to the income fromY sources. Therefore, after allocation of P's $50 of expenses, the resulting$25 inclusion attributable to the royalty income from X sources is stilltreated as passive income because the foreign taxes paid and deemed paidon the income do not exceed the highest United States tax rate multipliedby the $25 inclusion ($5andless;$8.50 (.34andmultiply;$25)). The $25 inclusionattributable to the interest income from Y sources is treated as generallimitation income because the foreign taxes paid and deemed paid exceedthe highest United States tax rate multiplied by the $25 inclusion ($10andgreater;$8.50(.34andmultiply;$25)). </ITAG><ITAG tagnum="21"><T3>Example (3). </T3>Controlled foreign corporation S is a wholly-ownedsubsidiary of domestic corporation P. S is incorporated and operating incountry Y and has a branch in country Z. S has two QBUs (QBU Y and QBUZ). In 1988, S earns $65 of gross passive royalty income in country Y throughQBU Y and $65 of gross passive royalty income in country Z through QBUZ. S allocates $15 of expenses to the gross passive royalty income earnedby each QBU, resulting in net income of $50 in each QBU. Country Y imposes$5 of foreign tax on the royalty income earned in Y, and country Z imposes$10 of tax on royalty income earned in Z. All of S's income constitutessubpart F foreign personal holding company income that is passive incomeand is included in P's gross income for the taxable year. P allocates $50of expenses pro rata to the $100 subpart F inclusion attributable to theQBUs (consisting of the $45 section 951 inclusion derived through QBU Y,the $5 section 78 amount attributable to QBU Y, the $40 section 951 inclusionderived through QBU Z, and the $10 section 78 amount attributable to QBUZ), resulting in a net inclusion of $50. Pursuant to paragraph (c)(4) ofthis section, the high-tax kickout rules must be applied separately tothe subpart F inclusion attributable to the income earned by QBU Y andthe income earned by QBU Z. After application of the high-tax kickout rules,the $25 inclusion attributable to Y will still be treated as passive incomebecause the foreign taxes paid and deemed paid on the income do not exceedthe highest United States tax rate multiplied by the $25 inclusion ($5andless;$8.50(.34andmultiply;$25)). The $25 inclusion attributable to Z will be treatedas general limitation income because the foreign taxes paid and deemedpaid on the income exceed the highest United States tax rate multipliedby the $25 inclusion ($10andgreater;$8.50 (.34andmultiply;$25)). </ITAG><ITAG tagnum="21"><T3>Example (4). </T3>Domestic corporation M operates in branch form inforeign countries X and Y. The branches are qualified business units (QBUs),within the meaning of section 989(a). In 1988, QBU X earns passive royaltyincome, interest income and rental income. All of the QBU X passive incomeis from country Z sources. The royalty income is not subject to a withholdingtax, and the interest income and the rental income are subject to a 5 percentand 10 percent withholding tax, respectively. QBU Y earns interest incomein Country Y that is not subject to foreign tax. For purposes of determiningwhether M's foreign source passive income is high-taxed income, the rentalincome and the interest income earned in QBU X are treated as one itemof income pursuant to paragraphs (c)(4)(ii) and (c)(3) of this section.The interest income earned in QBU Y and the royalty income earned in QBUX are each treated as a separate item of income under paragraphs (c)(4)(i)and (c)(4)(ii) and (c)(3) of this section.</ITAG><ITAG tagnum="21"><T3>Example (5). </T3>S, a controlled foreign corporation incorporatedin foreign country R, is a wholly-owned subsidiary of P, a domestic corporation.For 1988, P is required under section 951(a) to include in gross income$80 attributable to the earnings and profits of S for such year, all ofwhich is foreign personal holding company income that is passive rent orroyalty income. S does not make any distributions in 1988 or 1989. Foreignincome taxes paid by S for 1988 that are deemed paid by P for such yearunder section 960(a) with respect to the section 951(a) inclusion equal$20. Twenty dollars ($20) of P's expenses are properly allocated to thesection 951(a) inclusion. The foreign income tax paid with respect to thesection 951(a) inclusion does not exceed the highest United States taxrate multiplied by the amount of income after allocation of parent expenses($20andless;$27.20 (.34andmultiply;$80)). Thus, P's section 951(a) inclusionfor 1988 is included in P's passive income and the $20 of taxes attributableto that inclusion are treated as taxes related to passive income. In 1990,after P has filed its return for its 1988 tax year, S distributes $80 toP, and under section 959 that distribution is treated as attributable tothe earnings and profits with respect to the amount included in incomeby P in 1988 and is excluded from P's gross income. Foreign country R imposesa withholding tax of $15 on the distribution in 1990. Under paragraph (c)(6)(i)of this section, the withholding tax in 1990 does not affect the characterizationof the 1988 inclusion as passive income nor does it affect the characterizationof the $20 of taxes paid in 1988 as taxes paid with respect to passiveincome. No further parent expenses are allocable to the receipt of thatdistribution. In 1990, the foreign taxes paid ($15) exceed the productof the highest United States tax rate and the amount of the inclusion reducedby taxes deemed paid in the year of inclusion ($15andgreater;((.34andmultiply;$80)^$20)).Thus, under paragraph (c)(6)(iii) of this section, $7.20 ((.34andmultiply;$80)^$20))of the $15 withholding tax paid in 1990 is treated as taxes related topassive income and the remaining $7.80 ($15-$7.20) of the withholding taxis treated as related to general limitation income. </ITAG><ITAG tagnum="21"><T3>Example (6). </T3>The facts are the same as in Example (5) except thatS distributes the $80 in 1989 rather than 1990 and the distribution ismade during the prefiling period with respect to P's 1988 tax year. Underparagraph (c)(6)(ii) of this section both the $20 tax paid by S in 1988and the $15 withholding tax paid by P in 1989 are considered in determiningwhether the section 951(a) inclusion for 1988 is high-taxed income. Thus,because the total amount of foreign taxes paid with respect to the 1988inclusion exceeds the amount determined by multiplying the highest UnitedStates rate for 1988 by the amount of the inclusion reduced by allocableparent expenses ($35andgreater;$27.20 (.34andmultiply;$80)), the section 951(a)inclusion in 1988 is treated as general limitation income and the entire$35 of tax (the $20 of 1988 taxes and the $15 of 1989 taxes) is treatedas taxes related to general limitation income. </ITAG><ITAG tagnum="21"><T3>Example (7). </T3>S, a controlled foreign corporation incorporatedin foreign country R, is a wholly-owned subsidiary of P, a domestic corporation.For 1988, P is required under section 951(a) to include in gross income$80 attributable to the earnings and profits of S for such year, all ofwhich is foreign personal holding company income that is passive rent orroyalty income. S does not make any distributions in 1988. Foreign incometaxes paid by S for 1988 that are deemed paid by P for such year undersection 960(a) with respect to the section 951(a) inclusion equal $20.Twenty dollars ($20) of P's expenses are properly allocated to the section951(a) inclusion. In 1989, during P's prefiling period, foreign countryR redetermines the tax liability of S for 1987 to be $30. Under paragraph(c)(8) of this section the entire $30 of foreign tax is taken into accountin determining if the inclusion is high-taxed. The inclusion is consideredto be high-taxed because the foreign income tax paid with respect to thesection 951(a) inclusion exceeds the highest United States tax rate multipliedby the amount of income after allocation of parent expenses ($30andgreater;$27.20(.34andmultiply;$80)). Thus, P's section 951(a) inclusion for 1988 is includedin P's general limitation, and the $20 of taxes attributable to that inclusionare treated as taxes related to general limitation taxes. $10 will be addedto S's pool of general limitation taxes in 1989. </ITAG><ITAG tagnum="21"><T3>Example (8). </T3>S, a controlled foreign corporation, is a wholly-ownedsubsidiary of P, a domestic corporation. P and S are calendar year taxpayers.In 1987, S's only earnings consist of $200 of passive income that is foreignpersonal holding company income that is earned in a foreign country X.Under country X's tax system, the corporate tax on particular earningsis reduced on distribution of those earnings and no withholding tax isimposed. In 1987, S pays $100 of foreign tax. P does not elect to excludethis income from subpart F under section 954(b)(4) and includes $200 ingross income ($100 of net foreign personal holding company income and $100of the section 78 amount). At the time of the inclusion, the income isconsidered to be high-taxed income under paragraphs (c)(1) and (c)(6)(i)of this section and is general limitation income to P. S does not distributeany of its earnings in 1987. In 1988, S has no earnings. On December 31,1988, S distributes the $100 of earnings from 1987. At that time, S receivesa $50 refund from X attributable to the reduction of the country X corporatetax imposed on those earnings. Under paragraph (c)(7)(i) of this section,P must redetermine whether the 1987 inclusion should be considered to behigh-taxed income. By taking into account the reduction in foreign tax,the inclusion would not have been considered high-taxed income. Therefore,P must redetermine its foreign tax credit for 1987 and treat the inclusionand the taxes associated with the inclusion as passive income and taxes.P must follow the appropriate section 905(c) procedures. </ITAG><ITAG tagnum="21"><T3>Example (9). </T3>The facts are the same as in <T3>Example </T3>(8) except that P elects to apply section 954(b)(4) toS's passive income that is subpart F income. Although the income is notconsidered to be subpart F income, it remains passive income until distribution.In 1988, S distributes $150 to P. The distribution is a dividend to P becauseS has $150 of accumulated earnings and profits (the $100 of earnings in1987 and the $50 refund in 1988). P has no expenses allocable to the dividendfrom S. In 1988, the income is subject to the high-tax kick-out rules underparagraph (c)(7)(iii) of this section. The income is passive income toP because the foreign taxes paid and deemed paid by P with respect to theincome do not exceed the highest United States tax rate on that income.</ITAG><ITAG tagnum="21"><T3>Example (10). </T3>The facts are the same as in Example (8) exceptthat the distribution in 1988 is subject to a withholding tax of $25. Underparagraph (c)(7)(i) of this section, P must redetermine whether the 1987inclusion should be considered to be high-taxed income because there isa net $25 reduction of foreign tax. By taking into account both the reductionin foreign corporate tax and the withholding tax, the inclusion would continueto be considered high-taxed income. P must follow the appropriate section905(c) procedures. P must redetermine its foreign tax credit for 1987,but the inclusion and the $75 taxes ($50 of deemed paid tax and $25 withholdingtax) will continue to be treated as general limitation income and taxes.</ITAG><ITAG tagnum="21"><T3>Example (11). </T3>(i) S, a controlled foreign corporation operatingin country G, is a wholly-owned subsidiary of P, a domestic corporation.P and S are calendar year taxpayers. Country G imposes a tax of 50 percenton S's earnings. Under country G's system, the foreign corporate tax onparticular earnings is reduced on distribution of those earnings to 30percent and no withholding tax is imposed. Under country G's law, distributionsare treated as made pro rata from each year's earnings. For 1987, S's onlyearnings consist of passive income that is foreign personal holding companyincome that is earned in foreign country G. S has taxable income of $110for United States purposes and $100 for country G purposes. Country G,therefore, imposes a tax of $50 on the 1987 earnings of S. P does not electto exclude this income from subpart F under section 954(b)(4) and includes$110 in gross income ($60 of net foreign personal holding company incomeand $50 of the section 78 amount). At the time of the inclusion, the incomeis considered to be high-taxed income under paragraph (c) of this sectionand is general limitation income to P. S does not distribute any of itstaxable income in 1987. </ITAG><ITAG tagnum="21">(ii) In 1988, S earns general limitation income that is not subpartF income. S again has $110 in taxable income for United States purposesand $100 in taxable income for country G purposes, and S pays $50 of taxto foreign country G. In 1989, S has no taxable income or earnings. OnDecember 31, 1989, S distributes $60 of earnings and receives a refundof foreign tax of $24. Country G treats the distribution of earnings aspro rata from the earnings accumulated in 1987 and 1988. However, underparagraph (c)(7)(ii) of this section, the distribution, and, therefore,the reduction of tax is treated as first attributable to the $60 of passiveearnings attributable to income previously taxed in 1987. However, because,under foreign law, only 40 percent of the $50 of foreign taxes on the passiveearnings can be refunded, $20 of the $24 foreign tax refund reduces foreigntaxes on passive earnings. The other $4 of the tax refund reduces the generallimitation taxes from $50 to $46 (even though for United States purposesthe $60 distribution is entirely out of passive earnings). </ITAG><ITAG tagnum="21">(iii) Under paragraph (c)(7) of this section, P must redetermine whetherthe 1987 inclusion should be considered to be high-taxed income. By takinginto account the reduction in foreign tax, the inclusion would not havebeen considered high-taxed income ($30andless;.34andmultiply;$110). Therefore,P must redetermine its foreign tax credit for 1987 and treat the inclusionand the taxes associated with the inclusion as passive income and taxes.P must follow the appropriate section 905(c) procedures. </ITAG><ITAG tagnum="21"><T3>Example (12). </T3>Controlled foreign corporation S is a wholly ownedsubsidiary of domestic corporation P. S is incorporated in foreign countryX. Under country X's tax system, the foreign corporate tax on particularearnings is reduced on distribution and no withholding tax is imposed.In 1987, S has $200 of foreign personal holding company income that ispassive income that is subject to a foreign tax of $100. P does not electsection 954(b)(4) with respect to that income. S has no earnings and profitsin 1988. In 1988, S distributes the earnings and profits attributable tothe 1987 income on a date that is 30 days before P files its return forthe taxable year of inclusion and S receives a $50 refund of foreign taxon the distribution. P may file its return for the year of inclusion toreflect the decrease in foreign tax or file an amended return to reflectthe decrease in foreign tax if P does not reflect the decrease in its originalreturn. The prefiling exception does not apply when there is a reductionin foreign taxes imposed because, under the rules of paragraph (c)(7)(i)of this section and section 905(c), P must redetermine its foreign taxcredit for the year of inclusion and must redetermine whether the inclusionshould be considered high-taxed income.</ITAG>(d) <T3>High withholding tax interest. </T3>The term ``high withholding taxinterest'' means any interest if such interest is subject to a withholdingtax of a foreign country or a possession of the United States and the rateof tax applicable to such interest is at least 5 percent. For purposesof the preceding sentence, a withholding tax is any tax imposed by a foreigncountry or possession of the United States that is determined on a grossbasis. A withholding tax shall not be considered to be determined on agross basis if the tax is not the final tax payable on the interest income,but is merely a prepayment or credit against a final foreign tax liabilitydetermined on a net basis on the interest alone or on interest and otherincome. High withholding tax interest does not include any interest describedas export financing interest (as defined in section 904(d)(2)(G) and paragraph(h) of this section). (e) <T3>Financial services income</T3>_(1) <T3>In general. </T3>[Reserved] (2) <T3>Active financing income</T3>_(i) <T3>Income included.</T3> For purposes of paragraph (e)(1) and (e)(3) ofthis section, income is active financing income only if it is describedin any of the following subdivisions. (A) Income that is of a kind that would be insurance income as definedin section 953(a) (including related party insurance income as definedin section 953(c)(2)) and determined without regard to those provisionsof section 953(a)(1)(A) that limit insurance income to income from countriesother than the country in which the corporation was created or organized.(B) Income from the investment by an insurance company of its unearnedpremiums or reserves ordinary and necessary to the proper conduct of theinsurance business, income from providing services as an insurance underwriter,income from insurance brokerage or agency services, and income from lossadjuster and surveyor services. (C) Income from investing funds in circumstances in which the taxpayerholds itself out as providing a financial service by the acceptance orthe investment of such funds, including income from investing depositsof money and income earned investing funds received for the purchase oftraveler's checks or face amount certificates. (D) Income from making personal, mortgage, industrial, or other loans.(E) Income from purchasing, selling, discounting, or negotiating on a regularbasis, notes, drafts, checks, bills of exchange, acceptances, or otherevidences of indebtedness. (F) Income from issuing letters of credit and negotiating drafts drawnthereunder. (G) Income from providing trust services. (H) Income from arranging foreign exchange transactions, or engaging inforeign exchange transactions. (I) Income from purchasing stock, debt obligations, or other securitiesfrom an issuer or holder with a view to the public distribution thereofor offering or selling stock, debt obligations, or other securities foran issuer or holder in connection with the public distribution thereof,or participating in any such undertaking. (J) Income earned by broker-dealers in the ordinary course of business(such as commissions) from the purchase or sale of stock, debt obligations,commodities futures, or other securities or financial instruments and dividendand interest income earned by broker dealers on stock, debt obligations,or other financial instruments that are held for sale. (K) Service fee income from investment and correspondent banking. (L) Income from interest rate and currency swaps. (M) Income from providing fiduciary services. (N) Income from services with respect to the management of funds. (O) Bank-to-bank participation income. (P) Income from providing charge and credit card services or for factoringreceivables obtained in the course of providing such services. (Q) Income from financing purchases from third parties.(R) Income from gains on the disposition of tangible or intangible personalproperty or real property that was used in the active financing business(as defined in paragraph (e)(3)(i) of this section) but only to the extentthat the property was held to generate or generated active financing incomeprior to its disposition. (S) Income from hedging gain with respect to other active financing income.(T) Income from providing traveller's check services. (U) Income from servicing mortgages. (V) Income from finance leasing that would not qualify as active leasingincome under section 954(c)(2)(A). (W) High withholding tax interest that would otherwise be described asactive financing income. (X) Income from providing investment advisory services, custodial services,agency paying services, collection agency services, and stock transferagency services. (Y) Any similar item of income that is disclosed in the manner providedin the instructions to the Form 1118 or 1116 or that is designated as asimilar item of income in guidance published by the Internal Revenue Service.(3) <T3>Financial services entities</T3>_(i) <T3>In general. </T3>The term ``financial services entity'' means an individualor entity that is predominantly engaged in the active conduct of a banking,insurance, financing, or similar business (active financing business) forany taxable Year. Except as provided in paragraph (e)(3)(ii) of this section,a determination of whether an entity is a financial services entity shallbe done on an entity-by-entity basis. An individual or entity is predominantlyengaged in the active financing business for any year if for that year80 percent of its gross income is income described in paragraph (e)(2)(i)of this section. For this purpose, gross income includes all income realizedby an individual or entity, whether includible or excludible from grossincome under other operative provisions of the Code, but excludes gainfrom the disposition of stock of a corporation that prior to the dispositionof its stock is related to the transferor within the meaning of section267(b). For this purpose, income received from a related person that isa financial services entity shall be excluded if such income is characterizedunder the look-through rules of section 904(d)(3) and andSection; 1.904-5.In addition, income received from a related person that is not a financialservices entity but that is characterized as financial services incomeunder the look-through rules shall be excluded. Any income received froma related person that is characterized under the look-through rules andthat is not otherwise excluded by this paragraph will retain its charactereither as active financing income or other income in the hands of the recipientfor purposes of determining if the recipient is a financial services entityand if the income is financial services income to the recipient. (ii) <T3>Special rule for affiliated groups. </T3>In the case of any corporationthat is not a financial services entity under paragraph (e)(3)(i) of thissection, but is a member of an affiliated group (as defined in section1504(a) without regard to section 1504(b)(3)), such corporation will bedeemed to be a financial services entity if the affiliated group as a wholemeets the requirements of section (e)(3)(i) of this section. For purposesof determining if the affiliated group meets the requirements of paragraph(e)(3)(i) of this section the rules of this paragraph (e)(3)(ii) apply.The income of the group will not include any income from transactions withother members of the group. Leasing income of any member of the group willnot be considered active financing income if any member of the recipient'sgroup satisfies the active trade or business requirements of section 954(c)(2)(A),and the regulations thereunder, with respect to that income. Passive incomewill not be considered to be active financing income merely because thatincome is earned by a member of the group that is a financial servicesentity without regard to the rule in this paragraph (e)(3)(ii). (iii) <T3>Treatment of partnerships and other pass-through entities</T3>_(A)<T3>Rule. </T3>For purposes of determining whether a partner (includinga partnership that is a partner in a second partnership) is a financialservices entity, all of the partner's income shall be taken into account,except that income that is excluded under paragraph (e)(3)(i) of this sectionshall not be taken into account. Thus, if a partnership is determined tobe a financial services entity none of the income of the partner receivedfrom the partnership that is characterized under the look-through rulesshall be included for purpose of determining if the partner is a financialservices entity. If a partnership is determined not to be a financial servicesentity, then income of the partner from the partnership that is characterizedunder the look-through rules will be taken into account (unless such incomeis financial services income) and such income will retain its charactereither as active financing income or as other income in the hands of thepartner for purposes of determining if the partner is a financial serviceentity and if the income is financial services income to the partner. Ifa partnership is a financial services entity and the partner's income fromthe partnership is characterized as financial services income under thelook-through rules, then, for purposes of determining a partner's foreigntax credit limitation, the income from the partnership shall be consideredto be financial services income to the partner regardless of whether thepartner is itself a financial services entity. The rules of this paragraph(e)(3)(iii) will appIy for purposes of determining whether an owner ofan interest in any other pass-through entity the character of the incomeof which is preserved when such income is included in the income of theowner of the interest is a financial services entity.(B) <T3>Examples. </T3>The principles of paragraph (e)(3)(iii) of this sectionare illustrated by the following examples.<ITAG tagnum="21"><T3>Example (1). </T3>PS is a domestic partnership operating in branchform in foreign country X. PS has two equal general partners, A and B.A and B are domestic corporations that each operate in branch form in foreigncountries Y and Z. All of A's income, except that derived through PS, ismanufacturing income. All of B's income, except that derived through PS,is active financing income. A and B's only income from PS are distributiveshares of PS's income. PS is a financial services entity and all of itsincome is financial services income. The income from PS is excluded indetermining if A or B are financial services entities. Thus, A is not afinancial services entity because none of A's income is active financingincome and B is a financial services entity because all of B's income isactive financing income. However, both A and B's distributive shares ofPS's taxable income consist of financial services income even though Ais not a financial services entity. </ITAG><ITAG tagnum="21"><T3>Example (2). </T3>PS is a domestic partnership operating in foreigncountry X. A and B are domestic corporations that are equal general partnersin PS and, therefore, the look-through rules apply for purposes of characterizingA's and B's distributive shares of PS's income. Fifty (50) percent of PS'sgross income is active financing income that is not high withholding taxinterest. The active financing income includes income that also meets thedefinition of passive income and income that meets the definition of generallimitation income. The other 50 percent of PS's income is from manufacturing.PS is, therefore, not a financial services entity. A s and B's distributiveshares of partnership taxable income consist of general limitation manufacturingincome and active financing income. Under paragraph (c)(3)(i) of this section,the active financing income shall be financial services income to A orB if either A or B is determined to be a financial services entity. IfA or B is not a financial services entity, the distributive shares of incomefrom PS will not be financial services income to A or B and will consistof passive and general limitation income. All of the income from PS isincluded in determining if A or B are financial services entities.</ITAG>(4) <T3>Definition of incidental income</T3>_(i) <T3>In general</T3>_(A) <T3>Rule. </T3>Incidental income is income that is integrally related toactive financing income of a financial services entity. Such income includes,for example, income from precious metals trading and commodity tradingthat is integrally related to futures income. If securities, shares ofstock, or other types of property are acquired by a financial servicesentity as an ordinary and necessary incident to the conduct of a activefinancing business, the income from such property will be considered tobe financial services income but only so long as the retention of suchproperty remains an ordinary or necessary incident to the conduct of suchbusiness. Thus property, including stock, acquired as the result of, orin order to prevent, a loss in an active financing business upon a loanheld by the taxpayer in the ordinary course of such business will be consideredordinary and necessary to the conduct of such business, but income fromsuch property will be considered financial services income only so longas the holding of such property remains an ordinary and necessary incidentto the conduct of such business. If an entity holds such property for fiveyears or less then the property is considered held incident to the financialservices business. If an entity holds such property for more than fiveyears, a presumption will be established that the entity is not holdingsuch property incident to its financial services business. An entity willbe able to rebut the presumption by demonstrating that under the factsand circumstances it is not holding the property as an investment. However,the fact that an entity holds the property for more than five years andis not able to rebut the presumption that it is not holding the propertyincident to its financial services business will not affect the characterizationof any income received from the property during the first five years asfinancial services income. (B) <T3>Examples. </T3>The following examples illustrate the application ofparagraph (e)(4)(i) of this section.<ITAG tagnum="21"><T3>Example (1). </T3>X is a financial services entity within the meaningof paragraph (e)(3)(i) of this section. In 1987, X made a loan in the ordinarycourse of its business to an unrelated foreign corporation, Y. As securityfor that loan, Y pledged certain operating assets. Those assets generateincome of a type that would be subject to the general limitation. In January1989, Y defaulted on the loan and forfeited the collateral. During theperiod X held the assets, X earned operating income generated by thoseassets. This income was applied in partial satisfaction of Y's obligation.In 1993, X sold the forfeited assets. The sales proceeds were in excessof the remainder of Y's obligation. The operating income received in theperiod from 1989 to 1993 and the income on the sale of the assets in 1993are financial services income of X. </ITAG><ITAG tagnum="21"><T3>Example (2). </T3>The facts are the same as in <T3>Example </T3>(1), except that instead of pledging its operating assetsas collateral for the loan, Y pledged the stock of its operating subsidiaryZ. In 1993 X sold the stock of Z in complete satisfaction of Y's obligation.X's income from the sale of Z stock in satisfaction of Y's obligation isfinancial services income. </ITAG><ITAG tagnum="21"><T3>Example (3). </T3>P, a domestic corporation, is a financial servicesentity within the meaning of paragraph (e)(3)(i) of this section. P holdsa United States dollar denominated debt (the ``obligation'') of the CentralBank of foreign country X. The obligation evidences a loan of $100 madeby P to the Central Bank. In 1988, pursuant to a program of country X,P delivers the obligation to the Central Bank which credits 70 units ofcountry X currency to M, a country X corporation. M issues all of its onlyclass of capital stock to P. M invests the 70 units of country X currencyin the construction and operation of a new hotel in X. In 1994, M distributes10 units of country X currency to P as a dividend. P is not able to rebutthe presumption that it is not holding the stock of M incident to its financialservices business. The dividend to P is, therefore, not financial servicesincome.</ITAG>(ii) <T3>Income that is not incidental income. </T3>Income that is attributableto non-financial activity is not incidental income within the meaning ofparagraph (e)(4) (i) and (ii) of this section solely because such incomerepresents a relatively small proportion of the taxpayer's total incomeor that the taxpayer engages in non-financial activity on a sporadic basis.Thus, for example, income from data processing services provided to relatedor unrelated parties or income from the sale of goods or non-financialservices (for example travel services) is not financial services income,even if the recipient is a financial services entity. (5) <T3>Exceptions. </T3>Financial services income does not include incomethat is: (i) [Reserved]; (ii) [Reserved]; and (iii) Dividends from noncontrolled section 902 corporations as definedin section 904(d)(2)(E) and paragraph (g) of this section.(f) <T3>Shipping income. </T3>The term ``shipping income'' means any incomereceived or accrued by any person that is of a kind that would be foreignbase company shipping income (as defined in section 954(f) and the regulationsthereunder). Shipping income does not include any dividends received oraccrued from a noncontrolled section 902 corporation or any income thatis financial services income. (g) <T3>Noncontrolled section 902 corporation_</T3>(1) <T3>Definition. </T3>Except as otherwise provided, the term ``noncontrolledsection 902 corporation'' means any foreign corporation with respect towhich the taxpayer meets the stock ownership requirements of section 902(a)or, for purposes of applying the look-through rules described in section904(d)(3) and andSection; 1.904-5, the taxpayer meets the requirements ofsection 902(b). A controlled foreign corporation shall not be treated asa noncontrolled section 902 corporation with respect to any distributionsout of its earnings and profits for periods during which it was a controlledforeign corporation. In the case of a partnership owning a foreign corporation,the determination of whether a taxpayer meets the ownership requirementsof section 902 (a) or (b) will be made with respect to the partner's indirectownership, and not the partnership's direct ownership, in the foreign corporation.(2) <T3>Treatment of dividends from each separate noncontrolled section 902corporation_</T3>(i) <T3>In general. </T3>Except as otherwise provided, a separate foreign taxcredit limitation applies to dividends received or accrued by a corporationfrom each noncontrolled section 902 corporation. Any dividend distributionmade by a noncontrolled section 902 corporation out of earnings and profitsattributable to periods in which the shareholder did not meet the stockownership requirements of section 902(a) or section 902(b) shall be treatedas distributions made by a noncontrolled section 902 corporation. (ii) <T3>Special rule for dividends received by a controlled foreign corporation.</T3>If_ (A) Stock in a foreign corporation is owned by a controlled foreign corporation,(B) There are two or more shareholders of that controlled foreign corporation,and (C) The ownership requirements of section 902(b) with respect to the foreigncorporation are met by at least one of the United States shareholders ofthe controlled foreign corporation,</ITAG><ITAG tagnum="10">then any dividends received by the controlled foreign corporationfrom the foreign corporation shall be treated in their entirety to thecontrolled foreign corporation as dividends from a noncontrolled section902 corporation, notwithstanding that all the United States shareholdersof the controlled foreign corporation do not meet the requirements of section902(b). Any income received or accrued by a United States shareholder ofa controlled foreign corporation described in the preceding sentence thatis attributable to a dividend paid by a foreign corporation shall be consideredto be passive income if the shareholder's interest in that foreign corporationdoes not satisfy the requirements of section 902(b). (iii) <T3>Special rules for high withholding tax interest. </T3>If a taxpayerreceives or accrues a dividend distribution from a noncontrolled section902 corporation out of earnings and profits attributable to high withholdingtax interest earned or accrued by the noncontrolled section 902 corporation,any gross basis foreign tax (as defined in paragraph (d) of this section)imposed on such interest, to the extent that the taxes are imposed at arate in excess of 5 percent, shall not be treated as foreign taxes forpurposes of determining the amount of foreign taxes deemed paid or accruedby the taxpayer under section 902. The preceding sentence shall have noeffect upon the determination of the amount of earnings and profits ofa noncontrolled section 902 corporation. (iv) <T3>Treatment of inclusions under section 1293. </T3>[Reserved](3) <T3>Special rule for controlled foreign corporations. </T3>Distributionsfrom a controlled foreign corporation shall be treated as dividends froma noncontrolled section 902 corporation, and therefore not subject to thelook-through rules of andSection; 1.904-5, to the extent that the distributionis out of earnings and profits for periods during which the controlledforeign corporation was not a controlled foreign corporation. (4) <T3>Examples. </T3>The following examples illustrate the application ofthis paragraph (g).<ITAG tagnum="21"><T3>Example (1). </T3>A and B are domestic corporations. A owns 90 percentof the stock of C, a foreign corporation and B owns the remaining 10 percentof the C stock. C is a controlled foreign corporation. A and B are UnitedStates shareholders. C owns 20 percent of the stock of D, a foreign corporation,not a controlled foreign corporation, that is incorporated in a differentcountry than C. D is a noncontrolled section 902 corporation with respectto C and A, but not with respect to B. In 1987, C has foreign personalholding company income of $1000, $100 of which is attributable to a dividendfrom D. The remainder of the foreign personal holding company income ispassive income. Assume that gross income and net income are equal and thatC pays no foreign taxes on its foreign personal holding company income.In 1987, A and B have section 951(a)(1)(A) inclusions of $900 and $100,respectively, attributable to the foreign personal holding company income.Under paragraph (g)(2)(ii) of this section, the $900 included by A consistsof $810 passive income and $90 of income attributable to a dividend froma noncontrolled section 902 corporation. The $100 included by B in grossincome is characterized as passive income in its entirety although $10of the $100 is attributable to the dividend from D, and, as to C, thatdividend is characterized as a dividend from a noncontrolled section 902corporation. As to B, the $10 is characterized as passive income becauseB does not meet the ownership requirements of section 902(b) with regardto D. </ITAG><ITAG tagnum="21"><T3>Example (2). </T3>In 1987, A, a domestic corporation, owned 9 percentof the stock of B, a foreign corporation. In 1988, A acquired an additional20 percent of the stock of B. Thus, in 1988, B is a noncontrolled section902 corporation with regard to A. In 1989, A acquired an additional 25percent of the stock of B. A acquired no additional stock in 1990. In 1989and 1990, A owned 54 percent of the stock of B. For 1989 and 1990, B isa controlled foreign corporation in which A is a United States shareholder.B has no subpart F income in 1989 or 1990. In 1990, B pays a dividend of$3,000 to A. One thousand dollars ($1,000) of the dividend is attributableto earnings and profits from 1987, $1,000 is attributable to earnings andprofits from 1988, and $1,000 is attributable to earnings and profits from1989. Under paragraph (g)(1) of this section, the $1,000 attributable tothe earnings and profits from 1989 is subject to the look through rulesof section 904(d)(3) and andSection; 1.904-5(c)(4) and is characterized inA's hands according to those rules. Under paragraph (g)(3) of this section,the $2,000 attributable to the 1987 and 1988 earnings and profits is treatedas income subject to a separate limitation for dividends from a noncontrolledsection 902 corporation (B corporation). </ITAG><ITAG tagnum="21"><T3>Example (3). </T3>M owns 40 percent of the voting stock of foreigncorporation N. N is a noncontrolled section 902 corporation. In 1987, Nearns $2,000 of gross interest income and incurs $1,700 of interest expense.N incurs no other expenses and earns no other income. One-thousand dollars($1,000) of the interest income is subject to a 10 percent withholdingtax and is, therefore, high withholding tax interest. N's earnings andprofits are $200 ($2,000 gross interest income less $1,700 interest expenseless $100 withholding tax). N pays the full $200 out as a dividend. M receives$80 (40 percent of the $200). Under paragraph (g)(3) of this section, $50($100^5% andmultiply;$1,000) of the $100 withholding tax is not treated asa foreign tax for purposes of determining the amount of foreign taxes deemedpaid by M under section 902. M's deemed paid credit with respect to the$80 dividend it receives is, therefore, reduced from $40 ($100andmultiply;$80/$200)to $20 ($50andmultiply;$80/$200).</ITAG>(h) <T3>Export financing interest_</T3>(1) <T3>Definitions_</T3>(i) <T3>Export financing interest. </T3>The term ``export financing interest''means any interest derived from financing the sale (or other disposition)for use or consumption outside the United States of any property that ismanufactured, produced, grown, or extracted in the United States by thetaxpayer or a related person, and not more than 50 percent of the fairmarket value of which is attributable to products imported into the UnitedStates. For purposes of this paragraph, the term ``United States'' includesthe fifty States, the District of Columbia, and the Commonwealth of PuertoRico. (ii) <T3>Fair market value. </T3>For purposes of this paragraph, the fair marketvalue of any property imported into the United States shall be its appraisedvalue, as determined by the Secretary under section 402 of the Tariff Actof 1930 (19 U.S.C. 1401a) in connection with its importation. For purposesof determining the foreign content of an item of property imported intothe United States, see section 927 and the regulations thereunder. (iii) <T3>Related person. </T3>For purposes of this paragraph, the term ``relatedperson'' has the meaning given it by section 954(d)(3) except that suchsection shall be applied by substituting ``the person with respect to whomthe determination is being made'' for ``controlled foreign corporation''each place it applies. (2) <T3>Treatment of export financing interest. </T3>Except as provided inparagraph (h)(3) of this section, if a taxpayer derives export financinginterest from an unrelated person, then that interest shall be treatedas general limitation income. (3) <T3>Interaction of export financing interest and related person factoringincome_</T3>(i) <T3>Export financing interest that is also related person factoring income.</T3>Export financing interest shall be treated as passive income if thatincome is also related person factoring income. For this purpose relatedperson factoring income is_ (A) Income received or accrued by a controlled foreign corporation (otherthan a financial services entity) that is income described in section 864(d)(6)(income of a controlled foreign corporation from a loan for the purposeof financing the purchase of inventory property or services of a relatedperson); or (B) Income received or accrued by any person (other than a financial servicesentity) that is income described in section 864(d)(1) (income from a tradeor service receivable acquired from a related person). (ii) <T3>Export financing interest that is received or accrued by a financialservices entity. </T3>[Reserved] (iii) <T3>Export financing interest that is high-withholding tax interest. </T3>[Reserved](iv) <T3>Examples. </T3>The following examples illustrate the operation of thisparagraph (h)(3).<ITAG tagnum="21"><T3>Example (1). </T3>Controlled foreign corporation S is a wholly-ownedsubsidiary of domestic corporation P. S has accumulated cash reserves.P has uncollected trade and service receivables of foreign obligors. Psells the receivables at a discount (``factors'') to S. The income derivedby S on the receivables is related person factoring income. The incomeis also export financing interest. Because the income is related personfactoring income, the income is passive income to S. </ITAG><ITAG tagnum="21"><T3>Example (2). </T3>[Reserved] </ITAG><ITAG tagnum="21"><T3>Example (3). </T3>Domestic corporation S is a wholly-owned subsidiaryof domestic corporation P. S has accumulated cash reserves. P has uncollectedtrade and service receivables of foreign obligors. P factors the receivablesto S. The income derived by S on the receivables is related person factoringincome. The income is also export financing interest. The income will bepassive income to S. </ITAG><ITAG tagnum="21"><T3>Example (4). </T3>The facts are the same as in <T3>Example </T3>(3) except that instead of factoring P's receivables,S finances the sales of P's goods by making loans to the purchasers ofP's goods. The interest derived by S on these loans is export financinginterest and is not related person factoring income. The income will begeneral limitation income to S.</ITAG>(v) <T3>Income eligible for section 864(d)(7) exception (same country exception)from related person factoring treatment_</T3>(A) <T3>Income other than interest. </T3>If any foreign person that is nota financial services entity receives or accrues income that is describedin section 864(d)(7) (income on a trade or service receivable acquiredfrom a related person in the same foreign country as the recipient) andsuch income would also meet the definition of export financing interestif section 864(d)(1) applied to such income (income on a trade or servicereceivable acquired from a related person treated as interest), then theincome shall be considered to be export financing interest and shall betreated as general limitation income. (B) <T3>Interest income. </T3>If export financing interest is received or accruedby any foreign person and that income would otherwise be treated as relatedperson factoring income under section 864(d)(6) if section 864(d)(7) didnot apply, section 904(d)(2)(A)(iii)(II) shall apply, and the interestshall be treated as general limitation income unless the interest is receivedor accrued by a financial services entity. (C) <T3>Examples. </T3>The following examples illustrate the operation of paragraph(h)(4)(iii) (A) and (B) of this section.<ITAG tagnum="21"><T3>Example (1). </T3>Controlled foreign corporation S is a wholly-ownedsubsidiary of domestic corporation P. Controlled foreign corporation Tis a wholly-owned subsidiary of controlled foreign corporation S. S andT are incorporated in country M. In 1987, P sells tractors to T, whichT sells to X, a foreign corporation organized in country M. The tractorsare to be used in country M. T has uncollected trade receivables from Xthat it factors to S. The income derived by S from the receivables is notderived in an active financing business, and S is not a financial servicesentity. The income is not related person factoring income because it isdescribed in section 864(d)(7) (income eligible for the same country exception).Because the income derived by S from the receivables would meet the definitionof export financing interest if the income were described in section 864(d)(1),the income is considered to be export financing interest and is, therefore,general limitation income to S. </ITAG><ITAG tagnum="21"><T3>Example (2). </T3>[Reserved] </ITAG><ITAG tagnum="21"><T3>Example (3). </T3>Controlled foreign corporation S is a wholly-ownedsubsidiary of domestic corporation, P. Controlled foreign corporation Tis a wholly-owned subsidiary of controlled foreign corporation S. S andT are incorporated in country M. S is not a financial services entity.In 1987, P sells tractors to T, which T sells to X, a foreign partnershipthat is organized in country M and is related to S and T. S makes a loanto X to finance the tractor sales. The interest earned by S from financingthe sales is described in section 864(d)(7) and is export financing interest.Therefore, the income shall be general limitation income to S. </ITAG><ITAG tagnum="21"><T3>Example (4). </T3>[Reserved]</ITAG>(i) <T3>Interaction of section 907(c) and income described in this section.</T3>If a person receives or accrues income that is income described insection 907(c) (relating to oil and gas income), the rules of section 907(c)and the regulations thereunder, as well as the rules of this section, shallapply to the income. Thus, for example, if a taxpayer receives or accruesa dividend distribution from two separate noncontrolled section 902 corporationsout of earnings and profits attributable to income received or accruedby the noncontrolled section 902 corporations that is income describedin section 907(c), the rules provided in section 907 shall apply separatelyto the dividends received from each noncontrolled section 902 corporation.The reduction in amount allowed as foreign tax provided by section 907(a)shall therefore be calculated separately for dividends received or accruedby the taxpayer from each separate noncontrolled section 902 corporation.(j) <T3>Special rule for certain currency gains and losses. </T3>Any currencygain or loss computed under andSection; 1.985-3T(d)(2) will be allocatedamong the separate categories of income on the basis of foreign sourcegross income in that category before the application of the section 904(d)(2)(A)(iii)(III)(the exception from passive income for high-taxed income). (k) <T3>Priority rules. </T3>[Reserved]<ITAG tagnum="80">andSection; 1.904-5</ITAG><ITAG tagnum="89">Look-through rules as applied to controlled foreign corporations andother entities. </ITAG>(a) <T3>Definitions. </T3>For purposes of section 904(d)(3) and this section,the following definitions apply:(1) The term ``separate category'' means, as the context requires, anycategory of income described in section 904(d)(1) (A), (B), (C), (D), (E),(F), (G), (H), or (I) and in andSection; 1.904-4 (b), (d), (e), (f), and(g), or any category of earnings and profits to which income describedin such provisions is attributable. (2) The term ``controlled foreign corporation'' has the meaning given suchterm by section 957 (taking into account the special rule for certain captiveinsurance companies contained in section 953(c)). (3) The term ``United States shareholder'' has the meaning given such termby section 951(b) (taking into account the special rule for certain captiveinsurance companies contained in section 953(c)), except that for purposesof this section, a United States shareholder shall include any member ofthe controlled group of the United States shareholder. For this purposethe controlled group is any member of the affiliated group within the meaningof section 1504(a)(2) except that 50 percent shall be substituted for 80percent wherever it appears in section 1504(a)(2). (b) <T3>In general.</T3> Except as otherwise provided in section 904(d)(3)and this section, dividends, interest, rents, and royalties received oraccrued by a taxpayer from a controlled foreign corporation in which thetaxpayer is a United States shareholder shall be treated as general limitationincome. (c) <T3>Rules for specific types of inclusions and payments</T3>_(1) <T3>Subpart F inclusions</T3>_(i) <T3>Rule. </T3>Any amount included in gross income under section 951(a)(1)(A)shall be treated as income in a separate category to the extent the amountso included is attributable to income received or accrued by the controlledforeign corporation that is described as income in such category. For purposesof this paragraph, the priority rules of andSection; 1.904-4(k) shall applyprior to application of the rules of this paragraph. (ii) <T3>Examples. </T3>The following examples illustrate the application ofthis paragraph (c)(1):<ITAG tagnum="21"><T3>Example (1). </T3>Controlled foreign corporation S is a wholly-ownedsubsidiary of P, a domestic corporation. S earns $200 of net income, $85of which is foreign base company shipping income, $15 of which is foreignpersonal holding company income, and $100 of which is non-subpart F generallimitation income. No foreign tax is imposed on the income. One hundreddollars ($100) of S's income is subpart F income taxed currently to P undersection 951(a)(1)(A). Because $85 of the subpart F inclusion is attributableto shipping income of S, $85 of the subpart F inclusion is shipping incometo P. Because $15 of the subpart F inclusion is attributable to passiveincome of S, $15 of the subpart F inclusion is passive income to P. </ITAG><ITAG tagnum="21"><T3>Example (2).</T3> [Reserved] </ITAG><ITAG tagnum="21"><T3>Example (3).</T3> [Reserved] </ITAG><ITAG tagnum="21"><T3>Example (4). </T3>Controlled foreign corporation S is a wholly-ownedsubsidiary of domestic corporation P. S owns 40 percent of foreign corporationA, 45 percent of foreign corporation B, 30 percent of foreign corporationC and 20 percent of foreign corporation D. A, B, C, and D are noncontrolledsection 902 corporations. In 1987, S's only income is a $100 dividend fromeach foreign corporation. Assume that S pays no foreign taxes and has noexpenses. All $400 of the income is foreign personal holding company incomeand is included in P's gross income. P must include $100 in its separatelimitation for dividends from A, $100 in its separate limitation for dividendsfrom B, $100 in its separate limitation for dividends from C, and $100in its separate limitation for dividends from D.</ITAG>(2) <T3>Interest_</T3>(i) <T3>In general. </T3>Any interest that is received or accrued from a controlledforeign corporation by a taxpayer that is a United States shareholder insuch foreign corporation shall be treated as income in a separate categoryto the extent it is allocable to income of the controlled foreign corporationin that category. If related person interest (as defined in this paragraph(c)(2)(ii)) is received or accrued from a controlled foreign corporationby two or more persons, the amount of interest received or accrued by eachperson that is allocable to any separate category of income shall be determinedby multiplying the amount of related person interest allocable to thatseparate category of income by a fraction. The numerator of the fractionis the amount of related person interest received or accrued by that personand the denominator is the total amount of related person interest paidor accrued by the controlled foreign corporation. (ii) <T3>Allocating expenses including interest paid to a related person. </T3>Ifinterest is paid or accrued by a controlled foreign corporation to anyUnited States shareholder in such corporation (or to any other relatedperson) and the look-through rules apply (``related person interest''),such related person interest and other expenses of a controlled foreigncorporation shall be allocated and apportioned in the following manner.(A) Gross income in each separate category shall be determined; (B) Any expenses that are definitely related to less than all classes ofgross income, including unrelated person interest (as defined in paragraph(c)(2)(ii)(E) of this section) that is directly allocated to income froma specific property, shall be allocated and apportioned under the principlesof andSection; 1.861-8 to income in each separate category; (C) Related person interest shall be allocated to and shall reduce (butnot below zero) the amount of passive foreign personal holding companyincome as determined after the application of paragraph (c)(2)(ii)(B) ofthis section; (D) To the extent that related person interest exceeds passive foreignpersonal holding company income as determined after the application ofparagraph (c)(2)(ii) (B) and (C) of this section, the related person interestshall be allocated under the rules of this paragraph to separate categoriesother than passive income. If under andSection; 1.861-8, the gross incomemethod of allocating interest expense is elected, related person interestshall be allocated as follows: <ITAG tagnum="110"><C>5,L1(0,0,0),b1,tp0,p8,8/1,g1,t1,aw,21,5,50,2,45 </C>  <H1>Related person interest </H1><H1>minus </H1><H1>Related person interest allocated under paragraph (c)(2)(ii)(C) </H1><H1>andmultiply; </H1><H1>Gross income in a separate category (other than passive) </H1><H2>Total gross income (other than passive).</H2><ITAG tagnum="22"> </ITAG></ITAG>  If under andSection; 1.861-8, the asset method of allocating interest expenseis elected, related person interest shall be allocated according to thefollowing formula:<ITAG tagnum="110"><C>5,L1(0,0,0),b1,tp0,p8,8/1,g1,t1,aw,21,5,50,2,49 </C>  <H1>Related person interest </H1><H1>minus </H1><H1>Related person interest allocated under paragraph (c)(2)(ii)(C) </H1><H1>andmultiply; </H1><H1>Value of assets in a separate category (other than passive) </H1><H2>Value of total assets (other than passive).</H2> <ITAG tagnum="22">  </ITAG></ITAG> (E) Any other expenses (including unrelated person interest that is notdirectly allocated to income from a specific property)) that are not definitelyrelated expenses or that are definitely related to all classes of grossincome shall be apportioned under the rules of this paragraph to reduceincome in each separate category. For this purpose, unrelated person interestis all interest other than related person interest. If the taxpayer electsto use the gross income method to apportion the expense, then the expenseshall be apportioned according to the following formula:<ITAG tagnum="110"><C>5,L1(0,0,0),b1,tp0,p8,8/1,g1,t1,aw,39,2,7,2,55 </C>  <H1>Expense apportionable to a separate category </H1><H1>= </H1><H1>Expense </H1><H1>andmultiply; </H1><H1>Gross income in a separate category (minus related person interestallocated under paragraph (c)(2)(ii)(C) if the category is passive) </H1><H2>Total gross income minus related person interest allocated to passiveincome under paragraph (c)(2)(ii)(C)</H2> <ITAG tagnum="22">  </ITAG></ITAG> If the taxpayer uses the asset method to apportion the expense, then theexpense shall be apportioned according to the following formula:<ITAG tagnum="110"><C>5,L1(0,0,0),b1,tp0,p8,8/1,g1,t1,aw,39,2,7,2,55 </C>  <H1>Expense apportionable to a separate category </H1><H1>= </H1><H1>Expense </H1><H1>andmultiply; </H1><H1>Value of assets in a separate category (minus related person debt allocatedto passive assets if the category is passive) </H1><H2>Value of total assets minus related person debt allocated to passiveassets</H2> <ITAG tagnum="22">  </ITAG></ITAG> (iii) <T3>Definitions_</T3>(A) <T3>Value of assets and reduction in value of assets and gross income.</T3>For purposes of paragraph (c)(2)(ii) (D) and (E) of this section,the value of total assets is the value of assets in all categories (determinedunder the principles of andSection; 1.861-8). See andSection; 1.861-8 to determinethe reduction in value of assets and gross income for purposes of apportioningadditional third person interest expense that is not directly allocatedwhen some interest expense has been directly allocated. For purposes ofthis paragraph and paragraph (c)(2)(ii)(E) of this section, any reductionin the value of assets for indebtedness that relates to interest allocatedunder paragraph (c)(2)(ii)(C) of this section is made before determiningthe average of asset values. For rules relating to the averaging of reducedasset values see andSection; 1.861-8. (B) <T3>Related person debt allocated to passive assets. </T3>For purposesof paragraph (c)(2)(ii)(E) of this section, related person debt allocatedto passive assets is determined as follows:<ITAG tagnum="110"><C>5,L1(0,0,0),b1,tp0,p8,8/1,g1,t1,aw,49,2,22,2,55 </C>  <H1>Related person debt allocated to the passive category </H1><H1>= </H1><H1>Total related person debt </H1><H1>andmultiply; </H1><H1>Related person interest allocable to passive income under paragraph(c)(2)(ii)(C) </H1><H2>All related person interest</H2> <ITAG tagnum="22">  </ITAG></ITAG> For this purpose, the term ``total related person debt'' means the sumof the principal amounts of obligations of a controlled foreign corporationowed to any United States shareholder of such corporation or to any relatedentity (within the meaning of paragraph (g) of this section) determinedat the end of the taxable year. (iv) <T3>Examples. </T3>The following examples illustrate the operation of thisparagraph (c)(2).<ITAG tagnum="21"><T3>Example (1). </T3>(i) Controlled foreign corporation S is a wholly-ownedsubsidiary of P, a domestic corporation. In 1987, S earns $200 of foreignpersonal holding company income that is passive income. S also earns $100of foreign base company sales income that is general limitation income.S has $2000 of passive assets and $2000 of general limitation assets. In1987, S makes a $150 interest payment to P with respect to a $1500 loanfrom P. S also pays $100 of interest to an unrelated person on a $1000loan from that person. S has no other expenses. S uses the asset methodto allocate interest expense. </ITAG><ITAG tagnum="21">(ii) Under paragraph (c)(2)(ii)(C) of this section, the $150 relatedperson interest payment is allocable to S's passive foreign personal holdingcompany income. Therefore, the $150 interest payment is passive incometo P. Because the entire related person interest payment is allocated topassive income under paragraph (c)(2)(ii)(C) of this section, none of therelated person interest payment is allocable to general limitation incomeunder paragraph (c)(2)(ii)(D) of this section. Under paragraph (c)(2)(iii)(B)of this section, the entire amount of the related person debt is allocableto passive assets ($1500=$1500andmultiply;$150/$150). Under paragraph (c)(2)(ii)(E)of this section, $20 of interest expense paid to an unrelated person isallocated to passive income ($20=$100andmultiply;($2000^$1500)/($4000^$1500)).Eighty dollars ($80) of the interest expense paid to an unrelated personis allocated to general limitation income ($80=$100andmultiply;$2000/($4000^$1500)).</ITAG><ITAG tagnum="21"><T3>Example (2). </T3>The facts are the same as in <T3>Example </T3>(1), except that S uses the gross income method for allocatinginterest expense. Under paragraph (c)(2)(ii)(E) of this section, the unrelatedperson interest expense would be allocated on a gross income method. Therefore,$33 of interest expense paid to unrelated persons would be allocated topassive income ($33=$100andmultiply;($200^$150)/($300^$150) and $67 of interestexpense paid to unrelated persons would be allocated to general limitationincome ($67=$100andmultiply;$100/($300^$150). </ITAG><ITAG tagnum="21"><T3>Example (3). </T3>(i) The facts are the same as in <T3>Example </T3>(1), except that S has an additional $50 of third personinterest expense that is directly allocated to income from a specific propertythat produces only passive income. The principal amount of indebtednessto which the interest relates is $500. S also has $50 of additional non-interestexpenses that are not definitely related expenses and that are allocatedon an asset basis. </ITAG><ITAG tagnum="21">(ii) Under paragraph (c)(2)(ii)(B) of this section, the $50 of directlyallocated third person interest is first allocated to reduce the passiveincome of S. Under paragraph (c)(2)(ii)(C) of this section, the $150 ofrelated person interest is allocated to the remaining $150 of passive income.Under paragraph (c)(2)(iii)(B) of this section, all of the related persondebt is allocated to passive assets. ($1500=$1500andmultiply;$150/$150).</ITAG><ITAG tagnum="21">(iii) Under paragraph (c)(2)(ii)(E) of this section, the non-interestexpenses that are not definitely related are allocated on the basis ofthe asset values reduced by the allocated related person debt. Therefore$10 of these expenses are allocated to the passive category ($50andmultiply;($2000^$1500)/($4000^$1500))and $40 are allocated to the general category ($50andmultiply;($2000/($4000^$1500)).</ITAG><ITAG tagnum="21">(iv) In order to allocate third person interest between the categoriesof assets, the value of assets in a separate category must also be reducedunder the principles of andSection; 1.861-8 by the indebtedness relatingto the specifically allocated interest. Therefore, under paragraph (c)(2)(iii)(B)of this section, the value of assets in the passive category for purposesof allocating the additional third person interest =0 ($2000 minus $500(the principal amount of the debt, the interest payment on which is directlyallocated to specific interest producing properties) minus $1500 (the relatedperson debt allocated to passive assets)). Under paragraph (c)(2)(ii)(E)of this section, all $100 of the non-definitely related third person interestis allocated to the general limitation ($100=$100andmultiply;$2000/($4000^$500^$1500)).</ITAG><ITAG tagnum="21"><T3>Example (4). </T3>(i) Controlled foreign corporation S is a wholly-ownedsubsidiary of P, a domestic corporation. In 1987, S earns $100 of foreignpersonal holding company income that is passive income. S also earns $100of foreign base company sales income that is general limitation income.S has $1000 of general limitation assets and $1000 of passive assets. In1987, S makes a $150 interest payment to P on a $1500 loan from P and has$20 of general and administrative expenses (G andamp; A) that under the principlesof andSection; 1.861-8 is treated as directly allocable to all of P's grossincome. S also makes a $25 interest payment to an unrelated person on a$250 loan from the unrelated person. S has no other expenses. S uses theasset method to allocate interest expense. S uses the gross income methodto allocate G andamp; A. </ITAG><ITAG tagnum="21">(ii) Under paragraph (c)(2)(ii)(B) of this section, $100 of the interestpayment to P is allocable to S's passive foreign personal holding companyincome. Under paragraph (c)(2)(ii)(D) of this section, the additional $50of related person interest expense is allocated to general limitation income($50=$50andmultiply;$1000/$1000). Under paragraph (c)(2)(iii)(B) of thissection, related person debt allocated to passive assets equals $1000 ($1000=$1500andmultiply;$100/$150).</ITAG><ITAG tagnum="21">(iii) Under paragraph (c)(2)(ii)(E) of this section, none of the $25of interest expense paid to an unrelated person is allocated to passiveincome ($0=$25andmultiply;($1000^$1000)/($2000^$1000). Twenty-five dollars($25) of the interest expense paid to an unrelated person is allocatedto general limitation income ($25=$25andmultiply;$1000/($2000^$1000). Underparagraph (c)(2)(ii)(E) of this section, none of the G andamp; A is allocab1eto S's passive foreign personal holding company income ($0=$20andmultiply;($100^$100)/($200^$100).All $20 of the G andamp; A is allocable to S's general limitation income($20=$20andmultiply;$100/($200^$100). </ITAG><ITAG tagnum="21"><T3>Example (5). </T3>The facts are the same as in <T3>Example </T3>(4), except that S uses the gross income method to allocateinterest expense. As in <T3>Example </T3>(4), $100 of the interest payment to P is allocated topassive income under paragraph (c)(2)(ii)(C) of this section. Under paragraph(c)(2)(ii)(D) of this section, the additional $50 of related person interestexpense is allocated to general limitation income ($150^100andmultiply;$100/$100).Under paragraph (c)(2)(ii)(E) of this section, none of the unrelated personinterest expense and none of the G andamp; A is allocated to passive income,because after the application of paragraph (c)(2)(ii)(C) of this section,no passive income remains in the passive income category. </ITAG><ITAG tagnum="21"><T3>Example (6). </T3>Controlled foreign corporation T is a wholly-ownedsubsidiary of S, a controlled foreign corporation. S is a wholly-ownedsubsidiary of P, a domestic corporation. S is not a financial servicesentity. S and T are incorporated in the same country. In 1987, P sellstractors to T, which T sells to X, a foreign corporation that is relatedto both S and T and is organized in the same country as S and T. S makesa loan to X to finance the tractor sales. Assume that the interest earnedby S from financing the sales is export financing interest that is neitherrelated person factoring income nor foreign personal holding company income.The export financing interest earned by S is, therefore, general limitationincome. S earns no other income. S makes a $100 interest payment to P.The $100 of interest paid is allocable under the look-through rules ofparagraph (c)(2)(ii) of this section to the general limitation income earnedby S and is therefore general limitation income to P.</ITAG>(3) <T3>Rents and Royalties. </T3>Any rents or royalties received or accruedfrom a controlled foreign corporation in which the taxpayer is a UnitedStates shareholder shall be treated as income in a separate category tothe extent they are allocable to income of the controlled foreign corporationin that category under the principles of andSection; 1.861-8. (4) <T3>Dividends_</T3>(i) <T3>Look-through rule. </T3>Any dividend paid or accrued out of the earningsand profits of any controlled foreign corporation, shall be treated asincome in a separate category in proportion to the ratio of the portionof earnings and profits attributable to income in such category to thetotal amount of earnings and profits of the controlled foreign corporation.For purposes of this paragraph, the term ``dividend'' includes any amountincluded in gross income under section 951(a)(1)(B) as a pro rata shareof a controlled foreign corporation's increase in earnings invested inUnited States property.(ii) <T3>Special rule for dividends attributable to certain loans. </T3>If adividend is distributed to a taxpayer by a controlled foreign corporation,that controlled foreign corporation is the recipient of loan proceeds froma related look-through entity (within the meaning of paragraph (i) of thissection), and the purpose of such loan is to alter the characterizationof the dividend for purposes of this section, then, to the extent of theprincipal amount of the loan, the dividend shall be characterized withrespect to the earnings and profits of the related person lender ratherthan with respect to the earnings and profits of the dividend payor. Aloan will not be considered made for the purpose of altering the characterizationof a dividend if the loan would have been made or maintained on substantiallythe same terms irrespective of the dividend. The determination of whethera loan would have been made or maintained on substantially the same termsirrespective of the dividend will be made taking into account all the factsand circumstances of the relationship between the lender and the borrower.Thus, for example, a loan by a related party lender to a controlled foreigncorporation that arises from the sale of inventory in the ordinary courseof business will not be considered a loan made for the purpose of alteringthe character of any dividend paid by the borrower. (iii) <T3>Examples. </T3>The following examples illustrate the application ofthis paragraph (c)(4).<ITAG tagnum="21"><T3>Example (1). </T3>Controlled foreign corporation S is a wholly-ownedsubsidiary of P, a domestic corporation. In 1987, S has earnings and profitsof $1,000, $600 of which is attributable to general limitation income thatis not subpart F income and $400 of which is attributable to dividendsreceived by S from a noncontrolled section 902 corporation, T. T is incorporatedand operates in the same country as S, and S has a 50 percent ownershipinterest in T. In December of 1987, S pays a dividend of $200, all of whichis attributable to earnings and profits earned in 1987. Six-tenths of thedividend, $120, is treated as general limitation income because six-tenthsof S's earnings and profits are attributable to general limitation income.Four-tenths of the dividend, $80, is treated as income subject to a separatelimitation for dividends from a noncontrolled section 902 corporation becausefour-tenths of S's earnings and profits are attributable to dividends fromT, a noncontrolled section 902 corporation. </ITAG><ITAG tagnum="21"><T3>Example (2).</T3> A, a United States person, has been the sole shareholderin controlled foreign corporation X since its organization on January 1,1963. Both X and A are calendar year taxpayers. X's earnings and profitsfor 1963 through the end of 1987 totaled $3,000. A sells his stock in Xat the end of 1987 and realizes a gain of $4,000. Of the total $4,000 gain,$3,000 (A's share of the post-1962 earnings and profits) is includiblein A's gross income as a dividend and is subject to the look-through rulesincluding the transition rule of andSection; 1.904-7(a) with respect to theportion of the distribution out of pre-87 earnings and profits. The remaining$1,000 of the gain is includible as gain from the sale or exchange of theX stock and is passive income to A.</ITAG>(d) <T3>Effect of exclusions from subpart F income</T3>_(1) <T3>De minimis amount of subpart F income. </T3>[Reserved] (2) <T3>Exception for certain income subject to high foreign tax. </T3>Forpurposes of the dividend look-through rule of paragraph (c)(4)(i) of thissection, an item of net income that would otherwise be passive income (afterapplication of the priority rules of andSection; 1.904-4 (k)) and that isreceived or accrued by a controlled foreign corporation shall be treatedas general limitation income, and the earnings and profits attributableto such income shall be treated as general limitation earnings and profits,if the taxpayer establishes to the satisfaction of the Secretary that suchincome was subject to an effective rate of income tax imposed by a foreigncountry greater than 90 percent of the maximum rate of tax specified insection 11 (with reference to section 15, if applicable). The precedingsentence has no effect on amounts (other than dividends) paid or accruedby a controlled foreign corporation to a United States shareholder of suchcontrolled foreign corporation to the extent those amounts are allocableto passive income of the controlled foreign corporation. (3) <T3>Examples. </T3>The following examples illustrate the application ofthis paragraph. <T3>Example (1).</T3> [Reserved] <T3>Example (2).</T3> [Reserved] (e) <T3>Treatment of subpart F income in excess of 70 percent of gross income</T3>_(1)<T3>Rule. </T3>If the sum of a controlled foreign corporation's gross foreignbase company income (determined without regard to section 954(b)(5)) andgross insurance income for the taxable year exceeds 70 percent of the grossincome, then all of the controlled foreign corporation's gross income shallbe treated as foreign base company income and, thus, included in a UnitedStates shareholder's gross income. However, the inclusion in gross incomeof an amount that would not otherwise be subpart F income does not affectits character for purposes of determining whether the income is withina separate category. The determination of whether the controlled foreigncorporation's gross foreign base company income and gross insurance incomeexceeds 70 percent of gross income is made before the exception for certainincome subject to a high rate of foreign tax. (2) <T3>Example. </T3>The following example illustrates the application ofthis paragraph.<ITAG tagnum="21"><T3>Example. </T3>Controlled foreign corporation S is a wholly-owned subsidiaryof P, a domestic corporation. S earns $100, $75 of which is foreign personalholding company income and $25 of which is non-subpart F services income.S is not a financial services entity. S's gross and net income are equal.Under the 70 percent full inclusion rule of section 954(b)(3)(B), the entire$100 is foreign base company income currently taxable to P under section951. Because $75 of the $100 section 951 inclusion is attributable to S'spassive income, $75 of the inclusion is passive income to P. The remaining$25 of the inclusion is treated as general limitation income to P because$25 is attributable to S's general limitation income.</ITAG>(f) <T3>Modification of look-through rules for certain income</T3>_(1) <T3>High withholding tax interest. </T3>If a taxpayer receives or accruesinterest from a controlled foreign corporation that is a financial servicesentity, and the interest would be described as high withholding tax interestif section 904(d)(3) and paragraph (c)(2) of this section (the look-throughrules for interest) did not apply, then the interest shall be treated ashigh withholding tax interest to the extent that the interest is allocableunder section 904(d)(3) and paragraph (c)(2)(i) of this section to financialservices income of the controlled foreign corporation. The amount treatedas high-withholding tax interest under this paragraph (f)(1) shall notexceed the interest, or equivalent income, of the payor that would be takeninto account in determining the financial services income of the payorif the look-through rules applied.(2) <T3>Dividends from a noncontrolled section 902 corporation. </T3>If a UnitedStates shareholder that is a corporation receives or accrues income froma controlled foreign corporation that is attributable to dividends froma noncontrolled section 902 corporation, such income shall be subject toa separate limitation for such dividends except as provided in andSection;1.904-4(g)(2)(ii) (relating to dividends from a foreign corporation withrespect to which the United States shareholder does not meet the stockownership requirements of section 902). (3) <T3>Distributions from a FSC. </T3>Income received or accrued by a taxpayerthat, under the rules of paragraph (c)(4) of this section (look-throughrules for dividends), would be treated as foreign trade income or as passiveincome that is qualified interest and carrying charges (as defined in section245(c)), and that is also a distribution from a FSC (or former FSC), shallbe treated as a distribution from a FSC (or former FSC). (4) <T3>Example. </T3>The following example illustrates the operation of paragraph(f)(1) of this section.<ITAG tagnum="21"><T3>Example. </T3>Controlled foreign corporation S is a wholly-owned subsidiaryof P, a domestic corporation. S is a financial services entity. In 1988,S earns $80 of interest that meets the definition of financial servicesincome and $20 of high withholding tax interest. S makes a $100 interestpayment to P. The interest payment to P is subject to a withholding taxof 15 percent. Twenty dollars ($20) of the interest payment to P is consideredto be high withholding tax interest because, under section 904(d)(3), itis allocable to the high withholding tax interest earned by S. The remainingeighty dollars ($80) of the interest payment is also treated as high withholdingtax interest to P because, under paragraph (f)(1) of this section, interestthat is subject to a high withholding tax but would not be considered tobe high withholding tax interest under the look-through rules of paragraph(c)(2) of this section, shall be treated as high withholding tax interestto the extent that the interest would have been treated as financial servicesinterest income under the look-through rules of paragraph (c)(2)(i) ofthis section.</ITAG>(g) <T3>Application of look-through rules to certain domestic corporations.</T3>The principles of section 904(d)(3) and this section shall apply toany foreign source interest, rents, and royalties that are paid by oneUnited States corporation to another related United States corporation.For this purpose, two United States corporations are considered to be relatedif one owns, directly or indirectly, stock possessing 50 percent or moreof the total voting power of all classes of stock of the other corporationor 50 percent or more of the total value of the corporation. In addition,two United States corporations shall be considered related if the sameUnited States shareholders own, directly or indirectly, stock possessing50 percent or more of the total voting power of all classes of stock or50 percent of the total value of each corporation. For purposes of thisparagraph, the constructive stock ownership rules of section 318 apply.(h) <T3>Application of look-through rules to partnerships and other pass-throughentities</T3>_(1) <T3>General rule. </T3>Except as provided in paragraph (h)(2) of this section,a partner's distributive share of partnership income shall be characterizedas income in a separate category to the extent that the distributive shareis a share of income earned or accrued by the partnership in such category.Payments to a partner described in section 707 (<T3>e.g.,</T3> payments to a partner not acting in capacity as a partner)shall be characterized as income in a separate category to the extent thatthe payment is attributable under the principles of andSection; 1.861-8 andthis section to income earned or accrued by the partnership in such category,if the payments are interest, rents, or royalties that would be characterizedunder the look-through rules of this section if the partnership were aforeign corporation, and the partner who receives the payment owns 10 percentor more of the value of the partnership. A payment by a partnership toa member of the controlled group (as defined in paragraph (a)(3) of thissection) of the partner shall be characterized under the look-through rulesof this section if the payment would be a section 707 payment entitledto look-through treatment if it were made to the partner. (2) <T3>Exception for certain partnership interests</T3>_(i) <T3>Rule. </T3>Except as otherwise provided, if any limited partner orcorporate general partner owns less than 10 percent of the value in a partnership,the partner's distributive share of partnership income from the partnershipshall be passive income to the partner, and the partner's distributiveshare of partnership deductions from the partnership shall be allocatedand apportioned under the principles of andSection; 1.861-8 only to the partner'spassive income from that partnership. (ii) <T3>Exceptions. </T3>To the extent a partner's distributive share of incomefrom a partnership is a share of high withholding tax interest receivedor accrued by the partnership, that partner's distributive share of partnershipincome will be high withholding tax interest regardless of the partner'slevel of ownership in the partnership. If a partnership interest describedin paragraph (h)(2)(i) of this section is held in the ordinary course ofa partner's active trade or business, the rules of paragraph (h)(1) ofthis section shall apply for purposes of characterizing the partner's distributiveshare of the partnership income. A partnership interest will be consideredto be held in the ordinary course of a partner's active trade or businessif the partner (or a member of the partner's affiliated group of corporations(within the meaning of section 1504(a) and without regard to section 1504(b)(3)))engages (other than through a less than 10 percent interest in a partnership)in the same or related trade or business as the partnership. (3) <T3>Income from the sale of a partnership interest.</T3> [Reserved](4) <T3>Value of a partnership interest. </T3>For purposes of paragraphs (i),(h)(1), and (h)(2) of this section, a partner will be considered as owning10 percent of the value of a partnership for a particular year if the partnerhas 10 percent of the capital and profits interest of the partnership.Similarly, a partnership (first partnership) is considered as owning 50percent of the value of another partnership (second partnership) if thefirst partnership owns 50 percent of the capital and profits interestsof another partnership. For this purpose, value will be determined at theend of the partnership's taxable year. (i) <T3>Application of look-through rules to related entities_</T3>(1) <T3>In General. </T3>Except as provided in paragraph (i)(2) of this section,the principles of this section shall apply to distributions and paymentsthat are subject to the look-through rules of section 904(d)(3) and thissection from a controlled foreign corporation (or other entity describedin paragraph (h) of this section) (look-through entities) to a relatedlook-through entity. Two look-through entities shall be considered to berelated to each other if one owns, directly or indirectly, stock possessingmore than 50 percent of the total voting power of all classes of votingstock of the other entity or more than 50 percent of the total value ofsuch entity. In addition, two look-through entities are related if thesame United States shareholders own, directly or indirectly, stock possessing50 percent or more of the total voting power of all voting classes of stock(in the case of a corporation) or 50 percent or more of the total valueof each look-through entity. In the case of a corporation, value shallbe determined by taking into account all classes of stock. In the caseof a partnership, value shall be determined under the rules in paragraph(h)(4) of this section. For purposes of this section, indirect ownershipshall be determined under section 31B and the regulations thereunder. (2) <T3>Exception for distributive shares of partnership income. </T3>In thecase of tiered partnership arrangements, a distributive share of partnershipincome will be characterized under the look-through rules of section 904(d)(3)and this section if the partner meets the requirements of paragraph (h)(1)of this section with respect to the partnership (first partnership), whetheror not the income is received through another partnership or partnerships(second partnership) and whether or not the first partnership and the secondpartnership are considered to be related under the rules of paragraph (i)(1)of this section. (3) <T3>Special rule for payments from foreign parents to domestic subsidiaries.</T3>[Reserved] (j) <T3>Look-through rules applied to passive foreign investment company inclusions.</T3>[Reserved] (k) <T3>Ordering rules_</T3>(1) <T3>In general. </T3>The rules of paragraph (k)(2) of this section applyfor purposes of determining the character of income received or accruedby a person from a related person if the payor or another related personalso receives or accrues income from the recipient and the look-throughrules apply to the income in all cases. (2) <T3>Specific rules. </T3>For purposes of characterizing income under thisparagraph, the following types of income are characterized in the orderstated: (i) Rents and royalties; (ii) Interest; (iii) Subpart F inclusions and distributive shares of partnership income;(iv) Dividend distributions.</ITAG><ITAG tagnum="10">If an entity is both a recipient and a payor of income described inany one of the categories described in (k)(2) (i) through (iv) of thissection, the income received will be characterized before the income thatis paid. In addition, the amount of interest paid or accrued, directlyor indirectly, by a person to a related person shall be offset againstand eliminate any interest received or accrued, directly or indirectly,by a person from that related person before application of the orderingrules of this paragraph. In a case in which a person pays or accrues interestto a related person, and also receives or accrues interest indirectly fromthe related person, the smallest interest payment is eliminated and theamount of all other interest payments are reduced by the amount of thesmallest interest payment. (1) <T3>Examples. </T3>The following examples illustrate the application ofparagraphs (g), (h), (i), and (k) of this section.<ITAG tagnum="21"><T3>Example (1). </T3>S and T, controlled foreign corporations, are wholly-ownedsubsidiaries of P, a domestic corporation. S and T are incorporated intwo different foreign countries and T is a financial services entity. In1987, S earns $100 of income that is general limitation foreign base companysales income. After expenses, including a $50 interest payment to T, S'sincome is subject to foreign tax at an effective rate of 40 percent. Pelects to exclude S's $50 of net income from subpart F under section 954(b)(4).T earns $350 of income that consists of $300 of subpart F financial servicesincome and $50 of interest received from S. The $50 of interest is foreignpersonal holding company income in T's hands because section 954(c)(3)(A)(i)(same country exception for interest payments) does not apply. The $50of interest is also general limitation income to T because the look-throughrules of paragraph (c)(2)(i) of this section apply to characterize theinterest payment. Thus, with respect to T, P includes in its gross income$50 of general limitation foreign personal holding company income and $300of financial services income. </ITAG><ITAG tagnum="21"><T3>Example (2). </T3>[Reserved] </ITAG><ITAG tagnum="21"><T3>Example (3). </T3>P, a domestic corporation, wholly-owns S, a domesticcorporation that is a 80/20 corporation. In 1987, S's earnings consistof $100 of foreign source shipping income and $100 of foreign source highwithholding tax interest. S makes a $100 foreign source interest paymentto P. The interest payment to P is subject to the look-through rules ofparagraph (c)(2)(i) of this section, and is characterized as shipping incomeand high withholding tax interest to the extent that it is allocable tosuch income in S's hands. </ITAG><ITAG tagnum="21"><T3>Example (4).</T3> PS is a domestic partnership that is the sole shareholderof controlled foreign corporation S. PS has two general partners, A andB. A and B each have a greater than 10 percent interest in PS. PS alsohas two limited partners, C and D. C has a 50 percent interest in the partnershipand D has a 9 percent interest. A, B, C and D are all United States persons.In 1987, S has $100 of general limitation non-subpart F income on whichit pays no foreign tax. S pays a $100 dividend to PS. The dividend is theonly income of PS. Under the look-through rule of paragraph (c)(4) of thissection, the dividend to PS is general limitation income. Under paragraph(h)(1) of this section, A's, B's, and C's distributive shares of PS's incomeare general limitation income. Under paragraph (h)(2) of this section,because D is a limited partner with a less than 10 percent interest inPS, D's distributive share of PS's income is passive income. </ITAG><ITAG tagnum="21"><T3>Example (5). </T3>[Reserved] </ITAG><ITAG tagnum="21"><T3>Example (6). </T3>P, a domestic corporation, owns 100 percent of thestock of S, a controlled foreign corporation, and S owns 100 percent ofthe stock of T, a controlled foreign corporation. S has $100 of passiveforeign personal holding company income from unrelated persons and $100of general limitation income. S also has $50 of interest income from T.S pays T $100 of interest. Under paragraph (k)(2) of this section, the$100 interest payment from S to T is reduced for limitation purposes tothe extent of the $50 interest payment from T to S before application ofthe rules in paragraph (c)(2)(ii) of this section. Therefore, the interestpayment from T to S is disregarded. S is treated as if it paid $50 of interestto T, all of which is allocable to S's passive foreign personal holdingcompany income. Therefore the $50 interest payment from S to T is passiveincome. </ITAG><ITAG tagnum="21"><T3>Example (7). </T3>P, a domestic corporation, owns 100 percent of thestock of S, a controlled foreign corporation. S owns 100 percent of thestock of T, a controlled foreign corporation and 100 percent of the stockof U, a controlled foreign corporation. In 1988, T pays S $5 of interest,S pays U $10 of interest and U pays T $20 of interest. Under paragraph(k)(2) of this section, the interest payments from S to U must be offsetby the amount of interest that S is considered as receiving indirectlyfrom U and the interest payment from U to T is offset by the amount ofthe interest payment that U is considered as receiving indirectly fromT. The $l0 payment by S to U is reduced by $5, the amount of the interestpayment from T to S that is treated as being paid indirectly by U to S.Similarly, the $20 interest payment from U to T is reduced by $5, the amountof the interest payment from S to U that is treated as being paid indirectlyby T to U. Therefore, under paragraph (k)(2) of this section, T is treatedas having made no interest payment to S, S is treated as having paid $5of interest to U, and U is treated as having paid $15 to T. </ITAG><ITAG tagnum="21"><T3>Example (8). </T3>(i) P, a domestic corporation, owns 100 percent ofthe stock of S, a controlled foreign corporation, and S owns 100 percentof the stock of T, a controlled foreign corporation. In 1987, S earns $100of passive foreign personal holding income and $100 of general limitationnon-subpart F sales income from unrelated persons and $100 of general limitationnon-subpart F interest income from a related person, W. S pays $150 ofinterest to T. T earns $200 of general limitation sales income from unrelatedpersons and the $150 interest payment from S. T pays S $100 of interest.</ITAG><ITAG tagnum="21">(ii) Under paragraph (k)(2) of this section, the $100 interest paymentfrom T to S reduces the $150 interest payment from S to T. S is treatedas though it paid $50 of interest to T. T is treated as though it madeno interest payment to S. </ITAG><ITAG tagnum="21">(iii) Under paragraph (k)(2)(ii) of this section, the remaining $50interest payment from S to T is then characterized. The interest paymentis first allocable under the rules of paragraph (c)(2)(ii)(C) of this sectionto S's passive income. Therefore, the $50 interest payment to T is passiveincome. The interest income is foreign personal holding company incomein T's hands. T, therefore, has $50 of subpart F passive income and $200of non-subpart F general limitation income. </ITAG><ITAG tagnum="21">(iv) Under paragraph (k)(2)(iii) of this section, subpart F inclusionsare characterized next. P has a subpart F inclusion with respect to S of$50 that is attributable to passive income of S and is treated as passiveincome to P. P has a subpart F inclusion with respect to T of $50 thatis attributable to passive income of T and is treated as passive incometo P. </ITAG><ITAG tagnum="21"><T3>Example (9). </T3>(i) P, a domestic corporation, owns 100 percent ofthe stock of S, a controlled foreign corporation, and S owns 100 percentof the stock of T, a controlled foreign corporation. P also owns 100 percentof the stock of U, a controlled foreign corporation. In 1987, S earns $100of passive foreign personal holding company income and $200 of non-subpartF general limitation income from unrelated persons. S also receives $150of dividend income from T. S pays $100 of interest to T and $100 of interestto U. U earns $300 of non-subpart F general limitation income and the $100of interest received from S. U pays a $100 royalty to T. T earns the $100interest payment received from S and the $100 royalty received from U.</ITAG><ITAG tagnum="21">(ii) Under paragraph (k)(2)(i) of this section, the royalty paid byU to T is characterized first. Assume that the royalty is directly allocableto U's general limitation income. Also assume that the royalty is not subpartF income to T. With respect to T, the royalty is general limitation income.</ITAG><ITAG tagnum="21">(iii) Under paragraph (k)(2)(ii) of this section, the interest paymentsfrom S to T and U are characterized next. This characterization is donewithout regard to any dividend income received by S because, under paragraph(k)(2) of this section, dividends are characterized after interest paymentsfrom a related person. The interest payments are first allocable to S'spassive income under paragraph (c)(2)(ii)(C) of this section. Therefore,$50 of the interest payment to T is passive and $50 of the interest paymentto U is passive. The remaining $50 paid to T is general limitation incomeand the remaining $50 paid to U is general limitation income. All of theinterest payments to T and U are subpart F foreign personal holding companyincome to both recipients. </ITAG><ITAG tagnum="21">(iv) Under paragraph (k)(2)(iii) of this section, P has a $100 subpartF inclusion with respect to T that is characterized next. Fifty dollars($50) of the subpart F inclusion is passive income to P because it is attributableto the passive income portion of the interest income received by T fromS, and $50 of the inclusion is treated as general limitation income toP because it is attributable to the general limitation portion of the interestincome received by T from S. Under paragraph (k)(2)(iii) of this section,P also has a $100 subpart F inclusion with respect to U. Fifty dollars($50) of the subpart F inclusion is passive income to P because it is attributableto the passive portion of the interest income received by U from S, and$50 of the inclusion is general limitation income to P because it is attributableto the general limitation portion of the interest income received by Ufrom S. </ITAG><ITAG tagnum="21">(v) Under paragraph (k)(2)(iv) of this section, the $150 distributionfrom T to S is characterized next. One-hundred dollars ($100) of the distributionis out of earnings and profits attributable to previously taxed income.Therefore, only $50 is a dividend that is subject to the look-through rulesof paragraph (d) of this section. The $50 dividend is attributable to T'sgeneral limitation income and is general limitation income to S in itsentirety. </ITAG><ITAG tagnum="21"><T3>Example (10).</T3> (i) P, a domestic corporation, owns 100 percentof the stock of S, a controlled foreign corporation, and S owns 100 percentof the stock of T, a controlled foreign corporation. P also owns 100 percentof the stock of U, a controlled foreign corporation. S, T and U are allincorporated in the same foreign country. In 1987, S earns $100 of passiveforeign personal holding income and $200 of general limitation non-subpartF income from unrelated persons. S pays $100 of interest to T and $100of interest to U. U earns $300 of general limitation non-subpart F incomeand the $100 of interest received from S. T's only income is the $100 interestpayment received from S. </ITAG><ITAG tagnum="21">(ii) Under paragraph (k)(2)(ii) of this section, the interest paymentsfrom S to T and U are characterized first. The interest payments are firstallocated under the rule of paragraph (c)(2)(ii)(C) of this section toS's passive income. Therefore, under that provision and paragraph (c)(2)(i)of this section, $50 of the interest payment to T is passive income toT and $50 of the interest payment to U is passive income to U. The remaining$50 paid to T is general limitation income and the remaining $50 paid toU is general limitation income.</ITAG><ITAG tagnum="21">(iii) Under paragraph (k)(2)(iii) of this section, any subpart F inclusionof P is determined and characterized next. Under paragraph (g) of thissection, paragraphs (c)(2)(i) and (c)(2)(ii) apply not only for purposesof determining the separate category of income of S to which the interestpayments from S to T and U are allocable but also for purposes of determiningthe subpart F income of T and U. Although the interest payments from Sto T and U are ``same country'' interest payments that would otherwisebe excludible from T's and U's subpart F income under section 954(c)(3)(A)(i),section 954(c)(3)(B) provides that the exception for same country paymentsbetween related persons shall not apply to the extent such payments havereduced the subpart F income of the payor. In this case, $50 of the $100interest payment from S to T reduced S's subpart F income and $50 of the$100 interest payment from S to U reduced the remaining $50 of S's subpartF income. Therefore, T has $50 of subpart F income that is passive incomeand U has $50 of subpart F income that is passive income. P includes $100of subpart F income in gross income that is passive income to P. </ITAG><ITAG tagnum="21">(iv) The remaining $50 of interest paid by S to T and the remaining$50 of interest paid by S to U is not subpart F income to T or U becauseit did not reduce S's subpart F income and is therefore eligible for thesame country exception.</ITAG>(m) <T3>Application of section 904(g)_</T3>(1) <T3>In general. </T3>For purposes of determining the portion of an interestpayment that is allocable to income earned or accrued by a controlled foreigncorporation from sources within the United States under section 904(g)(3),the rules in paragraph (m)(2) of this section apply. For purposes of determiningthe portion of a dividend paid or accrued by a controlled foreign corporationthat is treated as from sources within the United States under section904(g)(4), the rules in paragraph (m)(4) of this section apply. For purposesof determining the portion of an amount included in gross income undersection 951(a) that is attributable to income of the controlled foreigncorporation from sources within the United States under section 904(g)(2),the rules in paragraph (m)(5) of this section apply. In order to determinewhether section 904(g) applies, section 904(g)(5) (exception if controlledforeign corporation has a de minimis amount of United States source income)shall be applied to the total amount of earnings and profits of a controlledforeign corporation for a taxable year without regard to the characterizationof those earnings under section 904(d). (2) <T3>Treatment of interest payments. </T3>If interest is received or accruedby a United States shareholder or a person related to a United States shareholder(within the meaning of paragraph (c)(2)(ii) of this section) from a controlledforeign corporation, the interest shall be considered to be allocable toincome of the controlled foreign corporation from sources within the UnitedStates for purposes of section 904(d) to the extent that the interest isallocable under paragraph (c)(2)(ii)(C) of this section to passive incomethat is from sources within the United States. If related person interestis less than or equal to passive income, the related person interest willbe allocable to United States source passive income based on the ratioof United States source passive income to total passive income. To theextent that related person interest exceeds passive income, and, therefore,is allocated under paragraph (c)(2)(ii)(D) of this section to income ina separate category other than passive, the following formulas apply indetermining the portion of the interest payment that is from sources withinthe United States. If the taxpayer uses the gross income method to allocateinterest, the portion of the interest payment from sources within the UnitedStates is determined as follows:<ITAG tagnum="110"><C>3,L1(0,0,0),b1,tp0,p8,8/1,g1,t1,24,1,24 </C>  <H1>The amount of the interest payment allocated to the separate categoryunder paragraph (c)(2)(ii)(D) of this section </H1><H1>andmultiply; </H1><H1>Gross income from United States sources in that category </H1><H2>Gross income from all sources in that category</H2> <ITAG tagnum="22">  </ITAG></ITAG> If the taxpayer uses the asset method to allocate interest, then the portionof the interest payment from sources within the United States is determinedas follows:<ITAG tagnum="110"><C>3,L1(0,0,0),b1,tp0,p8,8/1,g1,t1,24,1,24 </C>  <H1>The amount of the interest payment allocated to the separate categoryunder paragraph (c)(2)(ii)(D) of this section </H1><H1>andmultiply; </H1><H1>Value of domestic assets in that category </H1><H2>Value of total assets in that category</H2> <ITAG tagnum="22">  </ITAG></ITAG>  For purposes of this paragraph, the value of assets in a separate categoryis the value of assets as determined under the principles of andSection;1.861-8. See andSection; 1.861-8 for purposes of determining the value ofassets and gross income in a separate category as reduced for indebtednessthe interest on which is directly allocated. (3) <T3>Examples. </T3>The following examples illustrate the application ofthis paragraph.<ITAG tagnum="21"><T3>Example (1). </T3>Controlled foreign corporation S is a wholly-ownedsubsidiary of P, a domestic corporation. In 1988, S pays P $300 of interest.S has no other expenses. In 1988, S has $3000 of assets that generate $650of foreign source general limitation sales income and a $1000 loan to anunrelated foreign person that generates $20 of foreign source passive interestincome. S also has a $4000 loan to an unrelated United States person thatgenerates $70 of United States source passive income and $4000 of inventorythat generates $100 of United States source general limitation income.S uses the asset method to allocate interest expense. The following chartsummarizes S's assets and income: </ITAG><ITAG tagnum="110"><C>4,L2,tp0,i1,s25,8,8,8 </C>  <H1>  </H1><H1>Foreign </H1><H1>U.S. </H1><H1>Totals</H1> Assets: <ITAG tagnum="2">Passive <D>1000 </D><D>4000 </D><D>5000 </D></ITAG><ITAG tagnum="2">General <D>3000 </D><D>4000 </D><D>7000</D><R/></ITAG><ITAG tagnum="4">TotaI <D>4000 </D><D>8000 </D><D>12000 </D></ITAG>Income: <ITAG tagnum="2">Passive <D>20 </D><D>70 </D><D>90 </D></ITAG><ITAG tagnum="2">General <D>650 </D><D>100 </D><D>750</D><R/></ITAG><ITAG tagnum="4">Total <D>670 </D><D>170 </D><D>840</D></ITAG></ITAG> <ITAG tagnum="21">Under paragraph (c)(2)(ii)(C) of this section, $90 of the relatedperson interest payment is allocable to S's passive income. Under paragraph(m)(2) of this section, $70 is from sources within the United States and$20 is from foreign sources. Under paragraph (c)(2)(ii)(D) of this section,the remaining $210 of the related person interest payment is allocatedto general limitation income. Under paragraph (m)(2) of this section, $120of the remaining $210 is treated as income from sources within the UnitedStates ($120=$210andmultiply;$4000/$7000) and $90 is treated as income fromforeign sources. ($90=$210andmultiply;$3000/$7000). </ITAG><ITAG tagnum="21"><T3>Example (2). </T3>The facts are the same as in <T3>Example </T3>(1) except that S uses the gross income method to allocateinterest expense. The first $90 of related person interest expense is allocatedto passive income in the same manner as in Example (1). Under paragraph(c)(2)(ii)(D) of this section, the remaining $210 of the related personinterest expense is allocated to general limitation income. Under paragraph(m)(2) of this section, $28 of the remaining $210 is treated as incomefrom United States sources ($28=$210andmultiply;$100/$750) and $182 is treatedas income from foreign sources ($182=$210andmultiply;$650/$750).</ITAG><ITAG tagnum="21"><T3>Example (3). </T3>Controlled foreign corporation S is a wholly-ownedsubsidiary of P, a domestic corporation. In 1988, S pays $300 of interestto P. S has no other expenses. S uses the asset method to allocate interestexpense. In 1988, S has $4000 of assets that generate $650 of foreign sourcegeneral limitation manufacturing income and a $1000 loan to an unrelatedforeign person that generates $100 of foreign source passive interest income.S has $500 of shipping assets that generate $200 of foreign source shippingincome and $500 of shipping assets that generate $200 of United Statessource shipping income. S also has a $1000 loan to an unrelated UnitedStates person that generates $100 of United States source passive income.S's passive income is not also described as shipping income. The followingchart summarizes S's assets and income: </ITAG><ITAG tagnum="110"><C>4,L2,tp0,i1,s25,8,8,8 </C>  <H1> </H1><H1>Foreign </H1><H1>U.S. </H1><H1>Totals</H1> <T3>Assets: </T3><ITAG tagnum="2">Passive <D>1000 </D><D>1000 </D><D>2000 </D></ITAG><ITAG tagnum="2">Shipping <D>500 </D><D>500 </D><D>1000 </D></ITAG><ITAG tagnum="2">General <D>4000 </D><D>0 </D><D>4000</D><R/></ITAG><ITAG tagnum="4">Total <D>5500 </D><D>1500 </D><D>7000 </D></ITAG><T3>Income: </T3><ITAG tagnum="2">Passive <D>100 </D><D>100 </D><D>200 </D></ITAG><ITAG tagnum="2">Shipping <D>200 </D><D>200 </D><D>400 </D></ITAG><ITAG tagnum="2">General <D>650 </D><D>0 </D><D>650</D><R/></ITAG><ITAG tagnum="4">Total <D>950 </D><D>300 </D><D>1250</D></ITAG></ITAG> <ITAG tagnum="21">Under paragraph (c)(2)(ii)(C) of this section, $200 of the relatedperson interest payment is allocable to S's passive income. Under paragraph(m)(2) of this section, $100 of this amount is from foreign sources and$100 is from sources within the United States. </ITAG><ITAG tagnum="21">Under paragraph (c)(2)(ii)(D) of this section, $80 of the remaining$100 of the related person interest payment is allocated to general limitationincome ($80=$100andmultiply;$4000/$5000) and $20 is allocated to shippingincome ($20=$100andmultiply;$1000/$5000). </ITAG><ITAG tagnum="21">Under paragraph (m)(2) of this section, none of $80 of the interestpayment allocated to general limitation income is treated as income fromUnited States sources ($0=$80andmultiply;$0/$4000). Therefore, the entire$80 is treated as income from foreign sources. </ITAG><ITAG tagnum="21">Under paragraph (m)(2) of this section, $10 of the $20 of the interestpayment allocated to the shipping income is treated as income from UnitedStates sources ($10=$20andmultiply;$500/$1000) and $10 of the $20 is treatedas income from foreign sources ($10=$20andmultiply;$500/$1000). </ITAG><ITAG tagnum="21"><T3>Example (4). </T3>The facts are the same as in <T3>Example </T3>(3) except that S uses the gross income method to allocateinterest expense. The interest allocated to passive income under paragraph(c)(2)(ii)(C) of this section is the same, $200, $100 from United Statessources and $100 from foreign sources. </ITAG><ITAG tagnum="21">Under paragraph (c)(2)(ii)(D) of this section, the remaining $100of related person interest is allocated between the shipping and generallimitation categories based on the gross income in those categories. Therefore,$38 of the remaining $100 interest payment is allocated to shipping income($38=$100andmultiply;$400/($1250^$200)) and $62 is treated as allocated togeneral limitation income ($62=$100andmultiply;$650/($1250-$200)). </ITAG><ITAG tagnum="21">Under paragraph (m)(2) of this section, $16 of the $38 allocable toshipping income is treated as income from United States sources ($16=$38andmultiply;$200/$400)and $16 is treated as income from foreign sources ($16=$38andmultiply;$200/$400).</ITAG><ITAG tagnum="21">Under paragraph (m)(2) of this section, all of the $62 allocated togeneral limitation income is treated as income from foreign sources ($62=$62andmultiply;$650/$650).</ITAG>(4) <T3>Treatment of dividend payments_</T3>(i) <T3>Rule. </T3>Any dividend or distribution treated as a dividend underthis section that is received or accrued by a United States shareholderfrom a controlled foreign corporation shall be treated as income in a separatecategory derived from sources within the United States in proportion tothe ratio of the portion of the earnings and profits of the controlledforeign corporation in the corresponding separate category from UnitedStates sources to the total amount of earnings and profits of the controlledforeign corporation in that separate category. (ii) <T3>Determination of earnings and profits from United States sources. </T3>Inorder to determine the portions of earnings and profits from United Statessources and from foreign sources within each separate category, relatedperson interest shall be allocated to the United States source portionof income in a separate category by applying the rules of paragraph (m)(2)of this section. Other expenses shall be allocated by applying the rulesof paragraph (c)(2)(ii) of this section separately to the United Statessource income and the foreign source income in each category. For example,unrelated person interest expense that is allocated among categories ofincome based upon the relative amounts of assets in a category must beallocated between United States and foreign source income within each categoryby applying the rules of paragraph (c)(2)(ii)(E) of this section separatelyto United States source and foreign source assets in the separate category.(iii) <T3>Example. </T3>The following example illustrates the application ofthis paragraph.<ITAG tagnum="21"><T3>Example. </T3>Controlled foreign corporation, S, is a wholly ownedsubsidiary of P, a domestic corporation. S is a financial services entity.In 1987, S has $100 of non-subpart F general limitation earnings and profitsand $100 of non-subpart F financial services income. None of the generallimitation earnings and profits are from sources within the United States,and $50 of the financial services earnings and profits are from UnitedStates sources. In 1988, S earns $300 of non-subpart F general limitationearnings and profits and $500 of non-subpart F financial services earningsand profits. One hundred dollars ($100) of the general limitation earningsand profits are from sources within the United States. None of the financialservices earnings and profits are from United States sources. In 1988,S pays P a $500 dividend. Under paragraph (c)(4) of this section, $200of the dividend is attributable to general limitation earnings and profits($200=$500andmultiply;$400/$1000). Under this paragraph (m)(3), the portionof the dividend that is attributable to general limitation earnings andprofits from sources within the United States is $50 ($200andmultiply;$100/$400).Under paragraph (c)(4) of this section, $300 of the dividend is attributableto financial services earnings and profits ($300=$500andmultiply;$600/$1000).Under this paragraph (m)(3), the portion of the dividend that is attributableto financial services earnings and profits from sources within the UnitedStates is $25 ($300andmultiply;$50/$600).</ITAG>(5) <T3>Treatment of subpart F inclusions_</T3>(i) <T3>Rule. </T3>Any amount included in the gross income of a United Statesshareholder of a controlled foreign corporation under section 951(a) shallbe treated as income subject to a separate limitation that is derived fromsources within the United States to the extent such amount is attributableto income of the controlled foreign corporation in the corresponding categoryof income from sources within the United States. In order to determinea controlled foreign corporation's taxable income and earnings and profitsfrom sources within the United States in each separate category, the principlesof paragraph (m)(4)(ii) of this section shall apply.(ii) <T3>Example. </T3>The following example illustrates the application ofthis paragraph (m)(5).<ITAG tagnum="21"><T3>Example. </T3>Controlled foreign corporation S is a wholly-owned subsidiaryof domestic corporation, P. In 1987, S earns $100 of subpart F foreignpersonal holding company income that is passive income. Of this amount,$40 is derived from sources within the United States. S also earns $50of subpart F general limitation income. None of this income is from sourceswithin the United States. Assume that S pays no foreign taxes and has noexpenses. P is required to include $150 in gross income under section 951(a).Of this amount, $60 will be foreign source passive income to P and $40will be United States source passive income to P. Fifty dollars ($50) willbe foreign source general limitation income to P.</ITAG>(6) <T3>Treatment of section 78 amount. </T3>For purposes of treating taxesdeemed paid by a taxpayer under section 902(a) and section 960(a)(1) asa dividend under section 78, taxes that are paid or accrued with respectto United States source income in a separate category shall be treatedas United States source income in that separate category. (7) <T3>Coordination with treaties.</T3> [Reserved] (n) <T3>Order of application of sections 904 (d) and (g). </T3>In order toapply the rules of this section, section 904(d)(1) shall first be appliedto the controlled foreign corporation to determine the amount of incomeand earnings and profits derived by the controlled foreign corporationin each separate category. The income and earnings and profits in eachseparate category that is from United States sources shall then be determined.Sections 904(d)(3), 904(g), and this section shall then be applied forpurposes of characterizing and sourcing income received, accrued, or includedby a United States shareholder in the controlled foreign corporation thatis attributable or allocable to income or earnings and profits of the controlledforeign corporation. (o) <T3>Effective date. </T3>Section 904(d)(3) and this section apply to distributionsand section 951 inclusions of earnings and profits of a controlled foreigncorporation (or other entity to which this section applies) derived duringthe first taxable year of the controlled foreign corporation (or otherentity) beginning after December 31, 1986, and thereafter, and to paymentsmade by a controlled foreign corporation (or other entity) during suchtaxable years, without regard to whether the corresponding taxable yearof the recipient of the distribution or payment or of one or more of theUnited States shareholders of the controlled foreign corporation beginsafter December 31, 1986.<ITAG tagnum="80">andSection; 1.904-6</ITAG><ITAG tagnum="89">Allocation of taxes. </ITAG>(a) <T3>Allocation of taxes to a separate category or categories of income_</T3>(1)<T3>In general_</T3>(i) <T3>Taxes related to a separate category of income. </T3>The amount offoreign taxes paid or accrued with respect to a separate category of income(including United States source income) shall include only those taxesthat are related to income in that separate category. Taxes are relatedto income if the income is included in the base upon which the tax is imposed.If, for example, foreign law exempts certain types of income from foreigntaxes, or certain types of income are exempt from foreign tax under anincome tax convention, then no taxes are considered to be related to suchincome for purposes of this paragraph. As another example, if foreign lawprovides for a specific rate of tax with respect to certain types of income(<T3>e.g., </T3>capital gains), or certain expenses, deductions, or creditsare allowed under foreign law only with respect to a particular type ofincome, then such provisions shall be taken into account in determiningthe amount of foreign tax imposed on such income. A withholding tax (unlessit is a withholding tax that is not the final tax payable on the incomeas described in andSection; 1.904-4(d)) is related to the income from whichit is withheld. A tax that is imposed on a base that includes more thanone separate category of income is considered to be imposed on income inall such categories, and, thus, the taxes are related to all such categoriesincluded within the foreign country or possession's taxable income base.(ii) <T3>Apportionment of taxes related to more than one separate category.</T3>If a tax is related to more than one separate category, then, in orderto determine the amount of the tax paid or accrued with respect to eachseparate category, the tax shall be apportioned on an annual basis amongthe separate categories on the basis of the following formula: <ITAG tagnum="110"><C>3,L1(0,0,0),b1,tp0,p8,8/1,g1,t1,aw,19,2,19 </C>  <H1>Foreign tax related to more than one separate category </H1><H1>andmultiply; </H1><H1>Net income subject to that foreign tax included in a separate category</H1><H2>Net income subject to that foreign tax</H2><ITAG tagnum="22"> </ITAG></ITAG>  For purposes of apportioning foreign taxes among the separate categories,gross income is determined under the law of the foreign country or a possessionof the United States to which the foreign income taxes have been paid oraccrued. Gross income, as determined under foreign law, in the passivecategory shall first be reduced by any related person interest expensethat is allocated to the income under the principles of section 954(b)(5)and andSection; 1.904-5(c)(2)(ii)(C) (adjusted gross passive income). Grossincome in all separate categories (including adjusted gross passive income)is next reduced by deducting any expenses, losses, or other amounts thatare deductible under foreign law that are specifically allocable to thegross amount of such income under the laws of that foreign country or possession.If expenses are not specifically allocated under foreign law then the expenseswill be apportioned under the principles of foreign law but only aftertaking into account the reduction of passive income by the applicationof section 954(b)(5). Thus, for example, if foreign law provides that expenseswill be apportioned on a gross income basis, the gross income amounts willbe those amounts determined under foreign law except that, in the caseof passive income, the amount will be adjusted gross passive income. Ifforeign law does not provide for the direct allocation or apportionmentof expenses, losses, or other deductions to a particular category of income,then the principles of andSection; 1.861-8 and section 954(b)(5) shall applyin allocating such expenses, losses, or other deductions to gross incomeas determined under foreign law after reduction of passive income by theamount of related person interest allocated to passive income under section954(b)(5) and andSection; 1.904-5(c)(2)(ii)(C). For example, the principlesof andSection; 1.861-8 apply to require definitely related expenses to bedirectly allocated to particular categories of gross income and providethe methods of apportioning expenses that are definitely related to morethan one category of gross income or that are not definitely related toany particular category of gross income. For this purpose, the apportionmentof expenses required to be made under andSection; 1.861-8 need not be madeon other than a separate company basis. The rules in this paragraph applyonly for purposes of the apportionment of taxes among separate categoriesof income and do not affect the computation of a taxpayer's foreign taxcredit limitation with respect to a specific category of income.(iii) <T3>Apportionment of taxes for purposes of applying the high-tax incometest. </T3>If taxes have been allocated and apportioned to passive incomeunder the rules of paragraph (a)(1) (i) or (ii) of this section, the taxesmust further be apportioned to the groups of income described in andSection;1.904-4(c) (3), (4) and (5) for purposes of determining if the group ishigh-taxed income. Taxes will be related to income in a particular groupunder the same rules as those in paragraph (a)(1) (i) and (ii) of thissection except that those rules shall be applied by substituting the term``group'' for the term ``category.'' (2) <T3>Treatment of certain dividends from noncontrolled section 902 corporations.</T3>If a taxpayer receives or accrues a dividend from a noncontrolledsection 902 corporation, and if the Commissioner establishes that thereis an agreement, express or implied, that such dividend is paid out ofa designated pool of earnings of the foreign corporation, then only theforeign taxes imposed on that pool of earnings will be considered to betaxes related to the dividend. (b) <T3>Application of paragraph (a) to sections 902 and 960</T3>_(1) <T3>Determination of foreign taxes deemed paid. </T3>If, for the taxableyear, there is included in the gross income of a domestic corporation undersection 951 an amount attributable to the earnings and profits of a controlledforeign corporation for any taxable year and the amount included consistsof income in more than one separate category of the controlled foreigncorporation, then the domestic corporation shall be deemed to have paidonly a portion of the taxes paid or accrued, or deemed paid or accrued,by the controlled foreign corporation that are allocated to each separatecategory to which the inclusion is attributable. The portion of the taxesallocated to a particular separate category that shall be deemed paid bythe United States shareholder shall be equal to the taxes allocated tothat separate category multiplied by the amount of the inclusion with respectto that category (as determined under andSection; 1.904-5(c)(1)) and dividedby the earnings and profits of the controlled foreign corporation withrespect to that separate category (in accordance with andSection; 1.904-5(c)(2)(ii)).The rules of this paragraph (b)(1) also apply for purposes of computingthe foreign taxes deemed paid of United States shareholders of controlledforeign corporations under section 902. (2) <T3>Distributions received from foreign corporations that are excludedfrom gross income under section 959(b). </T3>The principles of this paragraphshall be applied to_(i) Any portion of a distribution received from a first-tier corporationby a domestic corporation that is excluded from the domestic corporation'sgross income under section 959(a) and andSection; 1.959-1, and (ii) Any portion of a distribution received from an immediately lower-tiercorporation by a second- or first-tier corporation that is excluded fromsuch foreign corporation's gross income under section 959(b) and andSection;1.959-2, if such distribution is treated as a dividend pursuant to andSection;1.960-2(a). (3) <T3>Application of section 78. </T3>For purposes of treating taxes deemedpaid by a taxpayer under section 902(a) and section 960(a)(1) as a dividendunder section 78, taxes that were allocated to income in a separate categoryshall be treated as income in that same separate category. (4) <T3>Increase in limitation. </T3>The amount of the increase in the foreigntax credit limitation allowed by section 960(b) and andSection; 1.960-4 shallbe determined with regard to the applicable category of income under section904(d). (c) <T3>Examples. </T3>The following examples illustrate the application ofthis section.<ITAG tagnum="21"><T3>Example (1). </T3>M, a domestic corporation, conducts business in foreigncountry X. M earns $400 of shipping income, $200 of general limitationincome and $200 of passive income as determined under foreign law. Underforeign law, none of M's expenses are directly allocated or apportionedto a particular category of income. Under the principles of andSection; 1.861-8,M allocates $75 of directly allocable expenses to shipping income, $10of directly allocable expenses to general limitation income, and no suchexpenses to passive income. M also allocates expenses that are not directlyallocable to a specific class of gross income_$40 to shipping income, $20to general limitation income, and $20 to passive income. Therefore, forpurposes of paragraph (a) of this section, M has $285 of net shipping income,$170 of net general limitation income, and $180 of net passive income.Country X imposes tax of $100 on a base that includes M's shipping incomeand general limitation income. Country X exempts passive income from tax.The tax paid by M is related to M's shipping and general 1imitation income.The $100 tax is apportioned between those limitations. Thus, M is consideredto have paid $63 of X tax on its shipping income ($100andmultiply;$285/$455)and $37 of tax on its general limitation income ($100andmultiply;$170/$455).None of the X tax is allocated to M's passive income. </ITAG><ITAG tagnum="21"><T3>Example (2). </T3>The facts are the same as in example (1) except thatX does not exempt all passive income from tax but only exempts interestincome. M's passive income consists of $100 of gross dividend income, towhich $10 of expenses that are not directly allocable are apportioned,and $100 of interest income, to which $10 of expenses that are not directlyallocable are apportioned. The $90 of net dividend income is subject toX tax, and $90 of net interest income is exempt from X tax. M pays $130of tax to X. The $130 of tax is related to M's general, shipping, and passiveincome. The tax is apportioned among those limitations as follows: $68to shipping income ($130andmultiply;$285/$545) $41 to general limitationincome ($130andmultiply;$170/$545), and $21 to passive income ($130andmultiply;$90/$545).</ITAG><ITAG tagnum="21"><T3>Example (3). </T3>P, a domestic corporation, owns 100 percent of S,a controlled foreign corporation organized in country X. S owns l00 percentof T, a controlled foreign corporation that is also organized in countryX. Country X grants group relief to S and T. In 1987, S earns $100 of incomeand T incurs an $80 loss. Under country X's group relief provisions, only$20 of S's income is subject to country X tax. Country X imposes a 30 percenttax on this income ($6). P includes $100 of S's income in gross incomeunder section 951. Six dollars ($6) of foreign tax is related to that incomefor purposes of section 960. </ITAG><ITAG tagnum="21"><T3>Example (4).</T3> P, a domestic corporation, owns 100 percent of S,a controlled foreign corporation organized in country X and 100 percentof T, a controlled foreign corporation organized in country Y. T has $200of gross manufacturing general limitation income and $50 of passive income.T also pays S $100 for shipping T's goods, a price that may be justifiedunder section 482. T has no other expenses and S has no other income orexpense. T's income and earnings and profits are the same. Foreign countryX does not tax S on its shipping income. Foreign country Y taxes all ofT's income at a rate of 20 percent. Under the law of foreign country Y,T is only allowed a $50 deduction for the payment to S. Therefore, forforeign law purposes, T has $150 of manufacturing income and earnings andprofits and $50 of passive income and earnings and profits upon which itpays $40 of tax. Under the principles of foreign law, $30 of that tax isimposed on the general limitation manufacturing income and $10 of the taxis imposed on passive income. Therefore, the foreign effective rate onthe general limitation income is 30 percent and the foreign effective rateon the passive income is 20 percent. T has $100 of general limitation incomeand $50 of passive income and pays $30 of general limitation taxes and$10 of passive taxes. S has $100 of shipping income and pays no foreigntax.</ITAG><ITAG tagnum="21"><T3>Example (5). </T3>R, a domestic corporation, owns 50 percent of T,a foreign corporation that is not a controlled foreign corporation andthat is organized in foreign country X. R licenses certain property toT. T then relicenses this property to a third person. In 1987, T paid Ra royalty of $100 all of which is treated as passive income to R becauseit was not an active royalty as defined in andSection; 1.904-4(b)(2). R has$10 of expenses associated with the royalty income and no foreign tax wasimposed on the royalty so the high-tax kickout does not apply. In 1988,the Commissioner determined that the correct arm's length royalty was $150and under the authority of section 482 reallocated an additional $50 ofincome to R for 1987. Under a closing agreement with the Commissioner,R elected the benefits of Rev. Proc. 65-17 in relation to the income reallocatedfrom R and established an account receivable from T. In 1988, T paid Ran additional $50 to reflect the section 482 adjustment and the accountreceivable that was established because of the adjustment. Foreign countryX treats the $50 payment in 1988 as a dividend by T and imposes a $10 withholdingtax on the payment. Under paragraph (a)(1) of this section, the $10 ofwithholding tax is treated as fully allocable to the $50 payment becauseunder foreign law the tax is imposed only on that income. For U.S. purposes,the income is not characterized as a dividend but as a repayment of a bonafide debt and therefore the $50 of income is not required to be recognizedby P in 1988. The $10 of tax is treated as a tax on the $50 of passiveincome included by P in 1987 pursuant to the section 482 adjustment ratherthan as taxes associated with a dividend from a noncontrolled section 902corporation and the taxes are therefore taxes imposed on passive income.</ITAG><ITAG tagnum="21"><T3>Example (6). </T3>P, a domestic corporation owns all of the stock ofS, a controlled foreign corporation that is incorporated in country X.In 1989, S has $100 of passive income, $200 of dividends from a noncontrolledsection 902 corporation and $200 of general limitation income. S also has$100 of related person interest expense and $100 of other expenses thatunder foreign law are directly allocable to the general limitation incomeof S. S has no other expenses. Country X imposes a tax of 25% on all ofthe net income of S and S, therefore, pays $75 in foreign tax. Under paragraph(a)(1)(ii) of this section, the passive income of S is first reduced bythe amount of related person interest for purposes of determining the netamount for purposes of allocating the $75 of tax. Under paragraph (a)(1)(ii)of this section, the general limitation income of S is reduced by the $100of other expenses. Therefore, $50 of the foreign tax is allocated to thedividends from a noncontrolled section 902 corporation ($25=$75andmultiply;$200/$300),$25 is allocated to the general limitation income of S ($25=$75andmultiply;$100/$300),and no taxes are allocated to S's passive income. </ITAG><ITAG tagnum="21"><T3>Example (7). </T3>R, a domestic corporation owns preferred stock inT, a foreign corporation that is not a controlled foreign corporation,incorporated in foreign country X. R's stock represents 15 percent of thevalue of T. Dividends on the preferred stock are paid only out of certaindesignated passive investments of T. Foreign country X does not tax thepassive income of T. Under paragraph (a)(2) of this section, no taxes willbe considered to be related to any dividend paid by T to R. </ITAG><ITAG tagnum="21"><T3>Example (8). </T3>Domestic corporation P owns all of the stock of controlledforeign corporation S, which owns all of the stock of controlled foreigncorporation T. All such corporations use the calendar year as the taxableyear. Assume that earnings and profits are equal to net income and thatthe income amounts are identical under United States and foreign law principles.In 1987, T earns $187.50 of gross passive income and $62.50 of gross generallimitation income and pays $50 of foreign taxes. Assume that T incurs noother expenses. S earns no income in 1987 and pays no foreign taxes. For1987, P is required under section 95l to include in gross income $175 attributableto the earnings and profits of T for such year. One hundred and fifty dollars($150) of the subpart F inclusion is attributable to passive income earnedby T, and $25 of the subpart F inclusion is attributable to general limitationincome earned by T. In 1988, T earns no income and pays no foreign taxes.T pays a $200 dividend to S, consisting of $175 from its earnings and profitsattributable to amounts required to be included in P's gross income withrespect to T and $25 from its other earnings and profits. Assume that nowithholding taxes imposed with respect to the distribution from T to S.In 1988, S earns $100 of gross general limitation income and receives a$200 dividend from T. S pays $30 of foreign taxes. Assume that S incursno other expenses. For 1988, P is required under section 951 to includein gross income $22.50 attributable to the earnings and profits of S forsuch year. The entire subpart F inclusion is attributable to general limitationincome earned by S. In 1988, S pays P a dividend of $247.50, consistingof $157.50 from its earnings and profits attributable to the amount requiredunder section 951 to be included in P's gross income with respect to T,$22.50 from its earnings and profits attributable to the amount requiredunder section 951 to be included in P's gross income with respect to S,and $67.50 from its other earnings and profits. The foreign income taxesdeemed paid by P for 1987 and 1988 under section 960(a)(1) and section902(a) are determined as follows upon the basis of the following factsand computations.</ITAG><ITAG tagnum="110"><C/> <H1> </H1><H1> </H1><H1> </H1><H1> </H1><ITAG tagnum="12"/><T3>T corporation (second-tier corporation):</T3>1. Pre-tax earnings and profits:<ITAG tagnum="2">(a) Passive income (p.i.)<D>187.50</D></ITAG><ITAG tagnum="13">Plus:</ITAG><ITAG tagnum="2">(b) General limitation income (g.l.i.)<D>62.50</D><R/></ITAG><ITAG tagnum="2">(c) Total<D>250.00</D></ITAG><ITAG tagnum="13">Less:</ITAG><ITAG tagnum="2">(d) Foreign income taxes paid on or with respect to T's earnings andprofits (20%)<D/><D>50.00</D><R/></ITAG><ITAG tagnum="2">(e) Earnings and profits<D/><D/><D>200.00</D></ITAG>2. Allocation of taxes:<ITAG tagnum="12">(a) Foreign income taxes paid by T that are allocable to p.i. earnedby T:</ITAG><ITAG tagnum="3">Line 1(d) taxes</ITAG><D/><D>50.00</D><ITAG tagnum="3">Multiplied by: foreign law net p.i.</ITAG><D/><D>187.50</D><ITAG tagnum="3">Divided by: foreign law total net income</ITAG><D/><D>250.00</D><R/><ITAG tagnum="3">Result</ITAG><D/><D/><D>37.50</D><ITAG tagnum="12">(b) Foreign income taxes paid by T that are allocable to g.l.i. earnedby T:</ITAG><ITAG tagnum="3">Line 1(d) taxes</ITAG><D/><D>50.00</D><ITAG tagnum="3">Multiplied by: foreign law net g.l.i.</ITAG><D/><D>62.50</D><ITAG tagnum="3">Divided by: foreign law total net income</ITAG><D/><D>250.00</D><R/><ITAG tagnum="3">Result</ITAG><D/><D/><D>12.50</D>3. T's earnings and profits:<ITAG tagnum="12">(a) Earnings and profits attributable to T's p.i.:</ITAG><ITAG tagnum="3">Line (1)(a) e andamp; p</ITAG><D/><D>187.50</D><ITAG tagnum="3">Less: line 2(a) taxes</ITAG><D/><D>37.50</D><R/><ITAG tagnum="3">Result</ITAG><D/><D/><D>150.00</D><ITAG tagnum="12">(b) Earnings and profits attributable to T's g.l.i.:</ITAG><ITAG tagnum="3">Line (1)(b) e andamp; p</ITAG><D/><D>62.50</D><ITAG tagnum="3">Less: line 2(b) taxes</ITAG><D/><D>12.50</D><R/><ITAG tagnum="3">Result </ITAG><D> </D><D> </D><D>50.00</D>4. Subpart F inclusion attributable to T:<ITAG tagnum="2">(a) Amount required to be included in P's gross income for 1987 undersection 951 with respect to T that is attributable to T's p.i.<D/><D/><D>150.00</D></ITAG><ITAG tagnum="2">(b) Amount required to be included in P's gross income for 1987 undersection 951 with respect to T that is attributable to T's g.l.i.<D/><D/><D>25.00</D></ITAG>5. Foreign income taxes deemed paid by P under section 960(a)(1) with respectto T:<ITAG tagnum="12">(a) Taxes deemed paid that are attributable to T's subpart F inclusionthat are attributable to T's p.i.:</ITAG><ITAG tagnum="3">Line 2(a) taxes</ITAG><D/><D>37.50</D><ITAG tagnum="3">Multiplied by: line 4(a) sec. 951 incl.</ITAG><D/><D>150.00</D><ITAG tagnum="3">Divided by: line 3(a) e andamp; p</ITAG><D/><D>150.00</D><R/><ITAG tagnum="3">Result:</ITAG><D/><D/><D>37.50</D><ITAG tagnum="12">(b) Taxes deemed paid that are attributable to T's subpart F inclusionthat are attributable to T's g.l.i.:</ITAG><ITAG tagnum="3">Line 2(b) taxes</ITAG><D/><D>12.50</D><ITAG tagnum="3">Multiplied by: line 4(b) sec. 951 incl.</ITAG><D/><D>25.00</D><ITAG tagnum="3">Divided by: line 3(b) e andamp; p</ITAG><D/><D>50.00</D><R/><ITAG tagnum="3">Result</ITAG><D/><D/><D>6.25</D>6. Dividends paid to S:<ITAG tagnum="2">(a) Dividends attributable to T's previously taxed p.i.<D/><D>150.00</D></ITAG><ITAG tagnum="14">Plus:</ITAG><ITAG tagnum="2">(b) Dividends attributable to T's previously taxed g.l.i.<D/><D>25.00</D></ITAG><ITAG tagnum="14">Plus:</ITAG><ITAG tagnum="2">(c) Dividends from T's non-previously taxed earnings and profits attributableto p.i.<D/><D>0</D></ITAG><ITAG tagnum="14">Plus:</ITAG><ITAG tagnum="2">(d) Dividends from T's non-previously taxed earnings and profits attributableto g.l.i.<D> </D><D> </D><D>25.00</D><R/></ITAG><ITAG tagnum="2">(e) Total dividends paid to S<D> </D><D> </D><D>200.00</D></ITAG>7. Taxes deemed paid by S:<ITAG tagnum="12">(a) Taxes of T deemed paid by S for 1987 under section 902(b)(1) withregard to T's p.i.:</ITAG><ITAG tagnum="3">Line 2(a) taxes</ITAG><D/><D>37.50</D><ITAG tagnum="3">Multiplied by: line 6(c) dividend</ITAG><D/><D>0</D><ITAG tagnum="3">Dividend by: line 3(a) e andamp; p </ITAG><D> </D><D> </D><D>150.00</D><R/><ITAG tagnum="3">Result</ITAG><D/><D/><D>0</D><ITAG tagnum="12">(b) Taxes of T deemed paid by S for 1987 under section 902(b)(1) withregard to T's g.l.i.:</ITAG><ITAG tagnum="3">Line 2(b) taxes</ITAG><D/><D>12.50</D><ITAG tagnum="3">Multiplied by: line 6(d) dividend</ITAG><D/><D>25.00</D><ITAG tagnum="3">Dividend by: line 3(b) e andamp; p</ITAG><D/><D>50.00</D><R/><ITAG tagnum="3">Result</ITAG><D/><D/><D>6.25</D><ITAG tagnum="12"/><T3>S corporation (first-tier corporation):</T3>8. Pre-tax earnings and profits:<ITAG tagnum="2">(a) Dividends from T attributable to T's non-previously taxed p.i.<D>0</D></ITAG><ITAG tagnum="13">Plus:</ITAG><ITAG tagnum="2">(b) Dividends from T attributable to T's non-previously taxed g.l.i.<D>25</D></ITAG><ITAG tagnum="13">Plus:</ITAG><ITAG tagnum="2">(c) Dividends from T attributable to T's previously taxed p.i.<D>150</D></ITAG><ITAG tagnum="13">Plus:</ITAG><ITAG tagnum="2">(d) Dividends from T attributable to T's previously taxed g.l.i.<D>25</D></ITAG><ITAG tagnum="13">Plus:</ITAG><ITAG tagnum="2">(e) Passive income other than dividend from T<D>0</D></ITAG><ITAG tagnum="13">Plus:</ITAG><ITAG tagnum="2">(f) General limitation income other than dividend from T<D>100.00</D><R/></ITAG><ITAG tagnum="2">(g) Total pre-tax earnings and profits<D/><D>300.00</D></ITAG><ITAG tagnum="2">(h) Foreign income taxes paid on or with respect to S's earnings andprofits (10%)<D/><D>30.00</D><R/></ITAG><ITAG tagnum="2">(i) Earnings and profits<D/><D/><D>270.00</D></ITAG>9. Allocation of taxes:<ITAG tagnum="12">(a) Foreign income taxes paid by S that are allocable to non-previouslytaxed p.i. earned by S:</ITAG><ITAG tagnum="3">Line 8(h) taxes</ITAG><D/><D>30.00</D><ITAG tagnum="3">Multiplied by: foreign law line 8(a) andamp; 8(e) p.i. amounts</ITAG><D/><D>0</D><ITAG tagnum="3">Dividend by: foreign law total net income</ITAG><D/><D>300.00</D><R/><ITAG tagnum="3">Result</ITAG><D/><D/><D>0</D><ITAG tagnum="12">(b) Foreign income taxes paid by S that are allocable to S's previouslytaxed p.i. received from T:</ITAG><ITAG tagnum="3">Line 8(h) taxes</ITAG><D/><D>30.00</D><ITAG tagnum="3">Multiplied by: foreign law line 8(c) p.i. amount</ITAG><D/><D>150.00</D><ITAG tagnum="3">Divided by: foreign law total net income</ITAG><D/><D>300.00</D><R/><ITAG tagnum="3">Result</ITAG><D/><D/><D>15.00</D><ITAG tagnum="12">(c) Foreign income taxes paid by S that are allocable to non-previouslytaxed g.l.i. earned by S:</ITAG><ITAG tagnum="3">Line 8(h) taxes</ITAG><D/><D>30.00</D><ITAG tagnum="3">Multiplied by: foreign law line 8(b) andamp; line 8(f) g.l.i. amounts</ITAG><D/><D>125.00</D><ITAG tagnum="3">Divided by: foreign law total net income</ITAG><D/><D>300.00</D><R/><ITAG tagnum="3">Result</ITAG><D/><D/><D>12.50</D><ITAG tagnum="12">(d) Foreign income taxes paid by S that are allocable to S's previouslytaxed g.l.i. received from T:</ITAG><ITAG tagnum="3">Line 8(h) taxes</ITAG><D/><D>30.00</D><ITAG tagnum="3">Multiplied by: foreign law line 8(d) amount</ITAG><D/><D>25.00</D><ITAG tagnum="3">Divided by: foreign law total net income</ITAG><D/><D>300.00</D><R/><ITAG tagnum="3">Result</ITAG><D/><D/><D>2.50</D>10. (a) Non-previously taxed earnings and profits of S:<ITAG tagnum="3">Lines 8(a), 8(b), 8(e), andamp; 8(f) e andamp; p</ITAG><D/><D>125.00</D><ITAG tagnum="3">Less: lines 9(a) andamp; 9(c) taxes</ITAG><D/><D>12.50</D><R/><ITAG tagnum="3">Result</ITAG><D/><D/><D>112.50</D><ITAG tagnum="2">(b) Portion of result in 10(a) attributable to S's p.i.<D/><D/><D>0</D></ITAG><ITAG tagnum="2">(c) Portion of result in 10(a) attributable to S's g.l.i.<D/><D/><D>112.50</D></ITAG>11. (a) Previously taxed earnings and profits of S:<ITAG tagnum="3">Lines 8(c) and 8(d) e andamp; p</ITAG><D/><D>175.00</D><ITAG tagnum="3">Less: lines 9(b) andamp; 9(d) taxes</ITAG><D/><D>17.50</D><R/><ITAG tagnum="3">Result</ITAG><D/><D/><D>157.50</D><ITAG tagnum="12">(b) Portion of result in 11(a) attributable to T's p.i.:</ITAG><ITAG tagnum="3">Line 8(c)</ITAG><D/><D>150.00</D><ITAG tagnum="3">Less: line 9(b) taxes</ITAG><D/><D>15.00</D><R/><ITAG tagnum="3">Result</ITAG><D/><D/><D>135.00</D><ITAG tagnum="12">(c) Portion of result in 11(a) attributable to T's g.l.i.:</ITAG><ITAG tagnum="3">Line 8(d)</ITAG><D/><D>25.00</D><ITAG tagnum="3">Less: line 9(d) taxes</ITAG><D/><D>2.50</D><R/><ITAG tagnum="3">Result</ITAG><D/><D/><D>22.50</D>12. Subpart F inclusion attributable to S:<ITAG tagnum="2">(a) Amount required to be included in P's gross income for 1988 undersection 951 with respect to S that is attributable to S's p.i.<D/><D/><D>0</D></ITAG><ITAG tagnum="2">(b) Amount required to be included in P's gross income for 1988 undersection 951 with respect to S that is attributable to S's g.l.i.<D/><D/><D>22.50</D></ITAG>13. Foreign income taxes deemed paid by P under section 960(a)(1) withrespect to S:<ITAG tagnum="12">(a) Taxes deemed paid that are attributable to S's subpart F inclusionthat are attributable to S's p.i.:</ITAG><ITAG tagnum="3">Line 9(a) taxes</ITAG><D/><D>0</D><ITAG tagnum="3">Multiplied by: line 12(a) sec. 951 incl.</ITAG><D/><D>0</D><ITAG tagnum="3">Divided by: line 10(b) e andamp; p</ITAG><D/><D>0</D><R/><ITAG tagnum="3">Result</ITAG><D/><D/><D>0</D><ITAG tagnum="12">(b) Taxes deemed paid that are attributable to S's subpart F inclusionthat are attributable to S's g.l.i.:</ITAG><ITAG tagnum="3">Line 9(c) taxes</ITAG><D/><D>12.50</D><ITAG tagnum="3">Multiplied by: line 12(b) sec. 951 incl.</ITAG><D/><D>22.50</D><ITAG tagnum="3">Divided by: line 10(c) e andamp; p</ITAG><D/><D>112.50</D><R/><ITAG tagnum="3">Result</ITAG><D/><D/><D>2.50</D><ITAG tagnum="12">(c) Foreign income taxes deemed paid by S deemed paid by P that areallocable to S's p.i.:</ITAG><ITAG tagnum="3">Line 7(a) taxes deemed paid by S</ITAG><D/><D>0</D><ITAG tagnum="3">Multiplied by: line 12(a) sec. 951 incl.</ITAG><D/><D>0</D><ITAG tagnum="3">Divided by: line 10(b) e andamp; p</ITAG><D/><D>0</D><R/><ITAG tagnum="3">Result</ITAG><D/><D/><D>0</D><ITAG tagnum="12">(d) Foreign income taxes deemed paid by S deemed paid by P that areallocable to S's g.l.i.:</ITAG><ITAG tagnum="3">Line 7(b) taxes deemed paid by S</ITAG><D/><D>6.25</D><ITAG tagnum="3">Multiplied by: line 12(b) sec. 951 incl.</ITAG><D/><D>22.50</D><ITAG tagnum="3">Divided by: line 10(c) e andamp; p</ITAG><D/><D>112.50</D><R/><ITAG tagnum="3">Result</ITAG><D/><D/><D>1.25</D>14. Dividends paid to P:<ITAG tagnum="2">(a) Dividends from S attributable to S's previously taxed p.i.<D/><D>0</D></ITAG><ITAG tagnum="14">Plus:</ITAG><ITAG tagnum="2">(b) Dividends from S attributable to S's previously taxed g.l.i.<D/><D>22.50</D></ITAG><ITAG tagnum="14">Plus:</ITAG><ITAG tagnum="12">(c) Dividends to which section 902(a) applies:</ITAG><ITAG tagnum="3">(i) Consisting of S's earnings and profits attributable to T's previouslytaxed p.i.</ITAG><D>135.00</D><ITAG tagnum="14">Plus:</ITAG><ITAG tagnum="3">(ii) Consisting of S's earnings and profits attributable to T's previouslytaxed g.l.i.</ITAG><D>22.50</D><ITAG tagnum="14">Plus:</ITAG><ITAG tagnum="3">(iii) Consisting of S's other p.i. earnings and profits</ITAG><D>0</D><ITAG tagnum="14">Plus:</ITAG><ITAG tagnum="3">(iv) Consisting of S's other g.l.i. earnings and profits</ITAG><D>67.50</D><R/><ITAG tagnum="3">(v) Total section 902 dividend</ITAG><D/><D>225.00</D><ITAG tagnum="2">(d) Total dividends paid to P<D/><D/><D>247.50</D></ITAG>15. Foreign income taxes deemed paid by P under section 902 and section960(a)(3) with respect to S:<ITAG tagnum="12">(a) Taxes paid by S deemed paid by P under section 902(a) with regardto S's p.i.:</ITAG><ITAG tagnum="3">Line 9(a) taxes</ITAG><D/><D>0</D><ITAG tagnum="3">Multiplied by: line 14(c)(iii) div.</ITAG><D/><D>0</D><ITAG tagnum="3">Divided by: line 10(b) e andamp; p</ITAG><D/><D>0</D><R/><ITAG tagnum="3">Result</ITAG><D/><D/><D>0</D><ITAG tagnum="12">(b) Taxes paid by S deemed paid by P under section 902(a) with regardto S's g.l.i.:</ITAG><ITAG tagnum="3">Line 9(c) taxes</ITAG><D/><D>12.50</D><ITAG tagnum="3">Multiplied by: line 14(c)(iv) div.</ITAG><D/><D>67.50</D><ITAG tagnum="3">Divided by: line 10(c) e andamp; p</ITAG><D/><D>112.50</D><R/><ITAG tagnum="3">Result</ITAG><D/><D/><D>7.50</D><ITAG tagnum="12">(c) Taxes deemed paid by S deemed paid by P under section 902(a) withregard to S's p.i.:</ITAG><ITAG tagnum="3">Line 7(a) deemed paid taxes</ITAG><D/><D>0</D><ITAG tagnum="3">Multiplied by: line 14(c)(iii) div.</ITAG><D/><D>0</D><ITAG tagnum="3">Divided by: line 10(b) e andamp; p</ITAG><D/><D>0</D><R/><ITAG tagnum="3">Result</ITAG><D/><D/><D>0</D><ITAG tagnum="12">(d) Taxes deemed paid by S deemed paid by P under section 902(a) withregard to S's g.l.i.:</ITAG><ITAG tagnum="3">Line 7(b) deemed paid taxes</ITAG><D/><D>6.25</D><ITAG tagnum="3">Multiplied by: line 14(c)(iv) div.</ITAG><D/><D>67.50</D><ITAG tagnum="3">Divided by: line 10(c) e andamp; p</ITAG><D/><D>112.50</D><R/><ITAG tagnum="3">Result</ITAG><D/><D/><D>3.75</D><ITAG tagnum="12">(e) Foreign income taxes paid by S under section 960(a)(3) deemedpaid by P with regard to S's previously taxed p.i.:</ITAG><ITAG tagnum="3">Line 9(b) taxes</ITAG><D/><D>15.00</D><ITAG tagnum="3">Multiplied by: line 14(c)(i) div.</ITAG><D/><D>135.00</D><ITAG tagnum="3">Divided by: line 11(b) e andamp; p</ITAG><D/><D>135.00</D><R/><ITAG tagnum="3">Result</ITAG><D/><D/><D>15.00</D><ITAG tagnum="12">(f) Foreign income taxes paid by S under section 960(a)(3) deemedpaid by P with regard to S's previously taxed g.l.i.:</ITAG><ITAG tagnum="3">Line 9(d) taxes</ITAG><D/><D>2.50</D><ITAG tagnum="3">Multiplied by: line 14(c)(ii) div.</ITAG><D/><D>22.50</D><ITAG tagnum="3">Divided by: line 11(c) e andamp; p</ITAG><D/><D>22.50</D><R/><ITAG tagnum="3">Result</ITAG><D/><D/><D>2.50</D><ITAG tagnum="12">Summary:</ITAG><ITAG tagnum="13">Total taxes deemed paid by P under section 960(a)(1) with respectto_</ITAG><ITAG tagnum="13">Passive income of S and T included under section 951 in income ofP:</ITAG><ITAG tagnum="4">Line 5(a)<D/><D>37.50</D></ITAG><ITAG tagnum="15">Plus:</ITAG><ITAG tagnum="4">Line 13(a)<D/><D>0</D></ITAG><ITAG tagnum="15">Plus:</ITAG><ITAG tagnum="4">Line 13(c)<D/><D>0</D><R/></ITAG><ITAG tagnum="4">Result<D/><D>37.50</D></ITAG><ITAG tagnum="13">General limitation income of S and T included under section 951 inincome of P:</ITAG><ITAG tagnum="4">Line 5(b)<D/><D>6.25</D></ITAG><ITAG tagnum="15">Plus:</ITAG><ITAG tagnum="4">Line 13(b)<D/><D>2.50</D></ITAG><ITAG tagnum="15">Plus:</ITAG><ITAG tagnum="4">Line 13(d)<D/><D>1.25</D><R/></ITAG><ITAG tagnum="4">Result<D/><D>10.00</D><R/></ITAG><ITAG tagnum="3">Total deemed paid taxes under section 960(a)(1)</ITAG><D/><D>47.50</D><ITAG tagnum="3">Total taxes deemed paid by P under section 902 and section 960(a)(3)attributable to passive income of S and T (line 15(e))</ITAG><D/><D/><D>15.00</D><ITAG tagnum="13">Total taxes deemed paid by P under section 902 and section 960(a)(3)attributable to general limitation income of S and T:</ITAG><ITAG tagnum="4">Line 15(b)<D/><D>7.50</D></ITAG><ITAG tagnum="15">Plus:</ITAG><ITAG tagnum="4">Line 15(d)<D/><D>3.75</D></ITAG><ITAG tagnum="15">Plus:</ITAG><ITAG tagnum="4">Line 15(f)<D/><D>2.50</D><R/></ITAG><ITAG tagnum="4">Result<D/><D>13.75</D></ITAG></ITAG><ITAG tagnum="80">andSection; 1.904-7</ITAG><ITAG tagnum="89">Transition rules. </ITAG>(a) <T3>Characterization of distributions and section 951(a)(1)(B) inclusionsof earnings of a controlled foreign corporation accumulated in taxableyears beginning before January 1, 1987 during taxable years of both thepayor controlled foreign corporation and the recipient which begin afterDecember 31, 1986_</T3>(1) <T3>In general. </T3>Income derived by a foreign corporation in taxableyears beginning before January 1, 1987, is characterized in the foreigncorporation's hands under section 904(d)(1)(A) (separate limitation interestincome), or section 904(d)(1)(E) (general limitation income) (prior totheir amendment by the Tax Reform Act of 1986 (the Act)) after applicationof the de minimis rule of former section 904(d)(3)(C) (prior to its amendmentby the Act). When, in a taxable year after the effective date of the Act,earnings and profits attributable to such income are distributed, or includedin the gross income of a United States shareholder under section 951(a)(1)(B),the ordering rules of section 904(d)(3)(D) and andSection; 1.904-5(c)(4),shall be applied in determining initially the character of the income ofthe distributee or United States shareholder. Thus, a proportionate amountof a distribution described in this paragraph will be initially characterizedas separate limitation interest income in the hands of the distributeebased on the ratio of the separate limitation interest earnings and profitsout of which the dividend was paid to the total earnings and profits outof which the dividend was paid. The distribution or section 951(a)(1)(B)inclusion must then be recharacterized in the hands of the distributeeor United States shareholder on the basis of the following principles:(i) Distributions and section 951(a)(1)(B) inclusions that are initiallycharacterized as separate limitation interest income shall be treated aspassive income; (ii) Distributions and section 951(a)(1)(B) inclusions that are initiallycharacterized as old general limitation income shall be treated as generallimitation income, unless the taxpayer establishes to the satisfactionof the Commissioner that the distribution or section 951(a)(1)(B) inclusionis attributable to: (A) Earnings and profits accumulated with respect to shipping income, asdefined in section 904(d)(2)(D) and andSection; 1.904-4(f), or (B) In the case of a financial services entity, earnings and profits accumulatedwith respect to financial services income, as defined in section 904(d)(2)(C)(ii)and andSection; 1.904-4(e)(1). (2) <T3>Limitation on establishing the character of earnings and profits. </T3>Inorder for a taxpayer to establish that distributions or section 951(a)(1)(B)inclusions that are attributable to general limitation earnings and profitsof a particular taxable year beginning before January 1, 1987, are attributableto shipping or financial services earnings and profits, the taxpayer mustestablish the amounts of foreign taxes paid or accrued with respect toincome attributable to those earnings and profits that are to be treatedas taxes paid or accrued with respect to shipping or financial servicesincome, as the case may be, under section 904(d)(2)(I). Conversely, inorder for a taxpayer to establish the amounts of general limitation taxespaid or accrued in a taxable year beginning before January 1, 1987, thatare to be treated as taxes paid or accrued with respect to shipping orfinancial services income, as the case may be, the taxpayer must establishthe amount of any distributions or section 951(a)(1)(B) inclusions thatare attributable to shipping or financial services earnings and profits.For purposes of establishing the amounts of general limitation taxes thatare to be treated as taxes paid or accrued with respect to shipping orfinancial services income, the principles of andSection; 1.904-6 shall beapplied.(b) <T3>Application of look-through rules to distributions (including deemeddistributions) and payments by an entity to a recipient when one's taxableyear begins before January 1, 1987 and the other's taxable year beginsafter December 31, 1986_</T3>(1) <T3>In general. </T3>This paragraph provides rules relating to the applicationof section 904(d)(3) to payments made by a controlled foreign corporationor other entity to which the look-through rules apply during its taxableyear beginning after December 31, 1986, but received in a taxable yearof the recipient beginning before January 1, 1987. The paragraph also providesrules relating to distributions (including deemed distributions) or paymentsmade by a controlled foreign corporation to which section 904(d)(3) (asin effect before the Act) applies during its taxable year beginning beforeJanuary 1, 1987, and received in a taxable year of the recipient beginningafter December 31, 1986. (2) <T3>Payor of interest, rents, or royalties is subject to the Act and recipientis not subject to the Act. </T3>If interest, rents, or royalties are paidor accrued on or after the start of the payor's first taxable year beginningon or after January 1, 1987, but prior to the start of the recipient'sfirst taxable year beginning on or after January 1, 1987, such interest,rents, or royalties shall initially be characterized in accordance withsection 904(d)(3) and andSection; 1.904-5. To the extent that interest paymentsin the hands of the recipient are initially characterized as passive incomeunder these rules, they will be treated as separate limitation interestin the hands of the recipient. To the extent that rents or royalties inthe hands of the recipient are initially characterized as passive incomeunder these rules, they will be recharacterized as general limitation incomein the hands of the recipient. (3) <T3>Recipient of interest, rents, or royalties is subject to the Act andpayor is not subject to the Act. </T3>If interest, rents, or royaltiesare paid or accrued before the start of the payor's first taxable yearbeginning on or after January 1, 1987, but on or after the start of therecipient's first taxable year beginning after January 1, 1987, the incomein the recipient's hands shall be initially characterized in accordancewith former section 904(d)(3) (prior to its amendment by the Act). To theextent interest income is characterized as separate limitation interestincome under these rules, that income shall be recharacterized as passiveincome in the hands of the recipient. Rents or royalties will be characterizedas general limitation income. (4) <T3>Recipient of dividends and subpart F inclusions is subject to the Actand payor is not subject to the Act. </T3>If dividends are paid or accruedor section 951(a)(1) inclusions occur before the start of the first taxableyear of a controlled foreign corporation beginning on or after January1, 1987, but on or after the start of the first taxable year of the distributeeor United States shareholder beginning on or after January 1, 1987, thedividends or section 951(a)(1) inclusions in the hands of the distributeeor United States shareholder shall be initially characterized in accordancewith former section 904(d)(3) (including the ordering rules of section904(d)(3)(A). Therefore, under former section 904(d)(3)(A), dividends areconsidered to be paid or derived first from earnings attributable to separatelimitation interest income. To the extent the dividend or section 951(a)(1)inclusion is initially characterized under these rules as separate limitationinterest income in the hands of the distributee or United States shareholder,the dividend or section 951(a)(1) inclusion shall be recharacterized aspassive income in the hands of the distributee or United States shareholder.The portion, if any, of the dividend or section 951(a)(1) inclusion thatis not characterized as passive income shall be characterized accordingto the rules in paragraph (a) of this section. Therefore, a taxpayer mayestablish that income that would otherwise be characterized as generallimitation income is shipping or financial services income. Rules comparableto the rules contained in section 904(d)(2)(I) shall be applied for purposesof characterizing foreign taxes deemed paid with respect to distributionsand section 951(a)(1) inclusions covered by this paragraph (b)(4).(5) <T3>Examples. </T3>The following examples illustrate the application ofthis paragraph (b).<ITAG tagnum="21"><T3>Example (1). </T3>P is a domestic corporation that is a fiscal yeartaxpayer (July 1-June 30). S, a controlled foreign corporation, is a wholly-ownedsubsidiary of P and has a calendar taxable year. On June l, 1987, S makesa $100 interest payment to P. Because the payment is made after January1, 1987 (the first day of S's first taxable year beginning after December31, 1986), the look-through rules of section 904(d)(3) apply to characterizethe payment made by S. To the extent, however, that the interest paymentto P is allocable to passive income earned by S, the payment will be includedin P's separate limitation for interest as provided in former section 904(d)(1)(A).</ITAG><ITAG tagnum="21"><T3>Example (2).</T3> P is a domestic corporation that is a calendar yeartaxpayer. S, a controlled foreign corporation, is a wholly-owned subsidiaryof P and has a July 1-June 30 taxable year. On June 1, 1987, S makes a$100 interest payment to P. Because the payment is made prior to July l,1987 (the first day of S's first taxable year beginning after December31, 1986), the look-through rules of section 904(d)(3) do not apply. Assumethat, under former section 904(d)(3), the interest payment would be characterizedas separate limitation interest income. For purposes of determining P'sforeign tax credit limitation, the interest payment will be passive incomeas provided in section 904(d)(1)(A). </ITAG><ITAG tagnum="21"><T3>Example (3). </T3>The facts are the same as in <T3>Example </T3>(2) except that on June 1, 1987, S makes a $100 dividenddistribution to P. Because the dividend is paid prior to July l, 1987 (thefirst day of S's first taxable year beginning after December 31, 1986),the look-through rules of section 904(d)(3) do not apply. Assume that,under former section 904(d)(3), S's earnings and profits for the taxableyear ending June 30, 1987, consist of $200 of earnings attributable togeneral limitation income and $75 of earnings attributable to separatelimitation interest income. The portion of the dividend that is attributableto S's separate limitation interest and is treated as separate limitationinterest income under former section 904(d)(3) is $75. The remaining $25of the dividend is treated as general limitation income under former section904(d)(3). For purposes of determining P's foreign tax credit limitation,$75 of the dividend will be recharacterized as passive income. The remaining$25 of the dividend will be characterized as general limitation income,unless P can establish that the general limitation portion is attributableto shipping or financial services income.</ITAG>(c) <T3>Installment sales. </T3>If income is received or accrued by any personon or after the effective date of the Act (as applied to such person) thatis attributable to a disposition of property by such person with regardto which section 453 or section 453(A) applies (installment sale treatment),and the disposition occurred prior to the effective date of the Act, thatincome shall be characterized according to the rules of andSection;andSection;1.904-4 through 1.904-7. (d) <T3>Special effective date for high withholding tax interest earned bypersons with respect to qualified loans described in section 1201(e)(2)of the Act. </T3>For purposes of characterizing interest received or accruedby any person, the definition of high withholding tax interest in andSection;1.904-6(d) shall apply to taxable years beginning after December 31, 1986,except as provided in section 1201(e)(2) of the Act. (e) <T3>Treatment of certain recapture income. </T3>Except as otherwise provided,if income is subject to recapture under section 585(c), the income shallbe general limitation income. If the income is recaptured by a taxpayerthat is a financial services entity, the entity may treat the income asfinancial services income if the taxpayer establishes to the satisfactionof the Secretary that the deduction to which the recapture amount is attributableis allocable to financial services income. If the taxpayer establishesto the satisfaction of the Secretary that the deduction to which the recaptureamount is attributable is allocable to high-withholding tax interest income,the taxpayer may treat the income as high-withholding tax interest.<ITAG tagnum="6">Lawrence B. Gibbs, </ITAG><ITAG tagnum="4">Commissioner of Internal Revenue.</ITAG><ITAG tagnum="21">Approved: June 27, 1988.</ITAG><ITAG tagnum="6">O. Donaldson Chapoton,</ITAG><ITAG tagnum="4">Assistant Secretary of the Treasury.</ITAG><ITAG tagnum="40">[FR Doc. 88-15978 Filed 7-15-88; 8:45 am]</ITAG><ITAG tagnum="68">BILLING CODE 4830-01-M</ITAG></ITAG></ITAG></ITAG></TEXT></DOC>